(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Source: mzansilive.co.za...”
“They dismissed it as yet another sensationalist story like many others.”
“The Pistorius family told the Sunday paper that they were not aware of any investigation into Pistorius’ alleged plot against the prison staff.”
“A raid of his cell weeks ago allegedly found “toxic pills” inside it, though these are likely to be prescription drugs and anti-depressants, which might also be used in a suicide attempt.”
“Mashego wrote that he had also established from warders that Pistorius had been planning to harm the Kgosi Mampuru II prison’s health manager and a nurse, as they had testified against him, describing him as violent.”
“The reports could not yet be confirmed.”
“Loading...”
“The report added that sharp blades were subsequently found in Pistorius’ cell during a search on Saturday afternoon.”
““An inmate situated close to the hospital section told City Press that Pistorius had injured himself intentionally,” the news report stated.”
“According to City Press, correctional services said Pistorius claimed he had injured himself after falling out of bed.”


Source: mzansilive.co.za...
They dismissed it as yet another sensationalist story like many others.
The Pistorius family told the Sunday paper that they were not aware of any investigation into Pistorius’ alleged plot against the prison staff.
A raid of his cell weeks ago allegedly found “toxic pills” inside it, though these are likely to be prescription drugs and anti-depressants, which might also be used in a suicide attempt.
Mashego wrote that he had also established from warders that Pistorius had been planning to harm the Kgosi Mampuru II prison’s health manager and a nurse, as they had testified against him, describing him as violent.
The reports could not yet be confirmed.
Loading...
The report added that sharp blades were subsequently found in Pistorius’ cell during a search on Saturday afternoon.
“An inmate situated close to the hospital section told City Press that Pistorius had injured himself intentionally,” the news report stated.
According to City Press, correctional services said Pistorius claimed he had injured himself after falling out of bed.



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Beheadings take place in public squares where the headless corpses are later put on display.”
“Saudi uses methods such as beheading, stoning and crucifixion to execute women for crimes, including adultery, in the strict Islamic country.”
“The boys were only advised "not to be victimized" the report further states.”
“However the verdict of the "male only" Sharia panel was that they need o be executed in accordance with the Sharia law.”
“According to HRW the girls were detained for more than a year before the trial and never confessed committing any crime.”
“...and protest...”
“The ultra conservative Arabian nation that has one of the worst human rights records is also a member of the United Nations Human Rights commission and recently got elected to the Women s Rights Commission as well which sparked anger...”
“When the police arrived the girls were dancing with their male friends and they were arrested immediately.”
“A neighbor supposedly an assistant of an Imam of a mosque close by has reported this to Saudi Arabia's religious police.”
“Fathima Al Kwaini and her friends that included three male friends have celebratedKwaini'sbirthday at a friends house.”


Beheadings take place in public squares where the headless corpses are later put on display.
Saudi uses methods such as beheading, stoning and crucifixion to execute women for crimes, including adultery, in the strict Islamic country.
The boys were only advised "not to be victimized" the report further states.
However the verdict of the "male only" Sharia panel was that they need o be executed in accordance with the Sharia law.
According to HRW the girls were detained for more than a year before the trial and never confessed committing any crime.
...and protest...
The ultra conservative Arabian nation that has one of the worst human rights records is also a member of the United Nations Human Rights commission and recently got elected to the Women s Rights Commission as well which sparked anger...
When the police arrived the girls were dancing with their male friends and they were arrested immediately.
A neighbor supposedly an assistant of an Imam of a mosque close by has reported this to Saudi Arabia's religious police.
Fathima Al Kwaini and her friends that included three male friends have celebratedKwaini'sbirthday at a friends house.



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe she can go to work with her benevolent father collecting huge speaking fees for destroying the country.”
“She won’t be starting Harvard this fall and she has no future in government, since all government jobs require drug tests.”
“No word now on Malia’s next move.”
“Looks like Daddy probably saved the day again.”
“She was last seen in the lobby when a black SUV pulled up out front and she willingly got in.”
“Malia was terminated immediately, her room was cleared and she was escorted from the private areas of the embassy to the common area where she could wait to change the dates on her travel visa so she could return home.”
“Ambassador Bedard is an avid hobbyist.”
“She was caught, by Embassy Security — aka the US Marines — on the roof of the building burning a doobie and playing with the Ambassador’s carrier pigeons.”
“It didn’t last long, however, because just like at home, Malia has issues with staying out of trouble.”
“In this case the daughter of a president was moved to the front of the line.”


Maybe she can go to work with her benevolent father collecting huge speaking fees for destroying the country.
She won’t be starting Harvard this fall and she has no future in government, since all government jobs require drug tests.
No word now on Malia’s next move.
Looks like Daddy probably saved the day again.
She was last seen in the lobby when a black SUV pulled up out front and she willingly got in.
Malia was terminated immediately, her room was cleared and she was escorted from the private areas of the embassy to the common area where she could wait to change the dates on her travel visa so she could return home.
Ambassador Bedard is an avid hobbyist.
She was caught, by Embassy Security — aka the US Marines — on the roof of the building burning a doobie and playing with the Ambassador’s carrier pigeons.
It didn’t last long, however, because just like at home, Malia has issues with staying out of trouble.
In this case the daughter of a president was moved to the front of the line.



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We believe that everyone, every team member, every guest, and every community, deserves to be treated equally, regardless of their religious beliefs.”More…~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~This is the video referenced above:Source:”
““If that means removing the bible from our shelves, then so be it.” Cornell said the big box chain is “sticking to its guns” regarding their bathroom policy, and will be phasing out anything having to do with religion.”
““Target will no longer cater to religious extremists,” said Cornell.”
“Speaking with CNBC, Cornell cited recent protests from what he calls “religious extremists” as the reason to pull the bible from its shelves.”
“The King James Bible has been available for purchase at Target stores ever since the company was founded as Goodfellow Dry Goods back in 1902.”
“The company has come under fire recently from religious groups for its new transgender bathroom policy.”
“Target CEO Brian Cornell announced today the retail giant will be discontinuing sales of the Holy Bible.”


“We believe that everyone, every team member, every guest, and every community, deserves to be treated equally, regardless of their religious beliefs.”More…~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~This is the video referenced above:Source:
“If that means removing the bible from our shelves, then so be it.” Cornell said the big box chain is “sticking to its guns” regarding their bathroom policy, and will be phasing out anything having to do with religion.
“Target will no longer cater to religious extremists,” said Cornell.
Speaking with CNBC, Cornell cited recent protests from what he calls “religious extremists” as the reason to pull the bible from its shelves.
The King James Bible has been available for purchase at Target stores ever since the company was founded as Goodfellow Dry Goods back in 1902.
The company has come under fire recently from religious groups for its new transgender bathroom policy.
Target CEO Brian Cornell announced today the retail giant will be discontinuing sales of the Holy Bible.



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bill Clinton is sitting on the front porch of the Chappaqua mansion drinking what looks like either tomato juice or a Bloody Mary.”We’ll update you as soon as we confirm that Clinton has gone on to answer for her crimes with an eternity in Hell.”
“She made no comment to the press but did stop to tell one photographer to have some respect while she ‘visits a great woman for the last time.’ She hasn’t come out and is presumably sitting and waiting to say goodbye.”
“Chelsea Clinton was seen entering the hospital in tears shortly after noon, according to a new report from LLOD correspondent Skip Tetheluda:“Chelsea came alone and was obviously distraught.”
“We predict she’ll be at rest within hours.”The Clinton family has asked for privacy and wouldn’t answer questions about whether or not they had to decide to “pull the plug” or if they’re simply being told nothing can be done.”
“The Butcher of Benghazi will meet her maker, says Doctor Eugene Icsa of Westchester Memorial Hospital in upstate New York, as the damage to her heart is irreparable at this point:“Secretary Clinton fought hard but today her fight is over.”
“It almost seems fitting that the last thing she hears is a lie about her own well-being.”
“Hillary Clinton had a third and most-likely fatal heart attack this afternoon after spending the morning being told she’d be getting better.”


Bill Clinton is sitting on the front porch of the Chappaqua mansion drinking what looks like either tomato juice or a Bloody Mary.”We’ll update you as soon as we confirm that Clinton has gone on to answer for her crimes with an eternity in Hell.
She made no comment to the press but did stop to tell one photographer to have some respect while she ‘visits a great woman for the last time.’ She hasn’t come out and is presumably sitting and waiting to say goodbye.
Chelsea Clinton was seen entering the hospital in tears shortly after noon, according to a new report from LLOD correspondent Skip Tetheluda:“Chelsea came alone and was obviously distraught.
We predict she’ll be at rest within hours.”The Clinton family has asked for privacy and wouldn’t answer questions about whether or not they had to decide to “pull the plug” or if they’re simply being told nothing can be done.
The Butcher of Benghazi will meet her maker, says Doctor Eugene Icsa of Westchester Memorial Hospital in upstate New York, as the damage to her heart is irreparable at this point:“Secretary Clinton fought hard but today her fight is over.
It almost seems fitting that the last thing she hears is a lie about her own well-being.
Hillary Clinton had a third and most-likely fatal heart attack this afternoon after spending the morning being told she’d be getting better.



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—Photo: GettyRelatedAlso On The Rickey Smiley Morning Show:”
“Good for Nelson, Robinson, and the city of Philadelphia in turning this into a positive moment.”
“Robinson and Nelson will also serve on a committee to establish and award the grants, which will focus on starting a pilot curriculum for public high school students to attain the skills to become business owners.”
“In addition, Donte Robinson and Rashon Nelson, both 23, will release the city and employees of all claims in exchange for the creation of a $200,000 fund that, through the help of a nonprofit organization, will assist young entrepreneurs in Philadelphia.”
“They will each be paid $1.”
“NBC News reports:The two black men whose arrest at a Philadelphia Starbucks last month set off a wave of protests against the coffee giant for discrimination have reached a settlement with the city, the mayor’s office said Wednesday.”
“Taking $1 dollar settlements each, Rashon Nelson and Donte Robinson will help spearhead a $200,000 grant program designed to aid young entrepreneurs like themselves.”
“Instead of a long and drawn-out legal battle, the men at the center of the Philadelphia Starbucks arrest incident have taken an incredibly low settlement from the city with a perk that speaks to their interests.”


—Photo: GettyRelatedAlso On The Rickey Smiley Morning Show:
Good for Nelson, Robinson, and the city of Philadelphia in turning this into a positive moment.
Robinson and Nelson will also serve on a committee to establish and award the grants, which will focus on starting a pilot curriculum for public high school students to attain the skills to become business owners.
In addition, Donte Robinson and Rashon Nelson, both 23, will release the city and employees of all claims in exchange for the creation of a $200,000 fund that, through the help of a nonprofit organization, will assist young entrepreneurs in Philadelphia.
They will each be paid $1.
NBC News reports:The two black men whose arrest at a Philadelphia Starbucks last month set off a wave of protests against the coffee giant for discrimination have reached a settlement with the city, the mayor’s office said Wednesday.
Taking $1 dollar settlements each, Rashon Nelson and Donte Robinson will help spearhead a $200,000 grant program designed to aid young entrepreneurs like themselves.
Instead of a long and drawn-out legal battle, the men at the center of the Philadelphia Starbucks arrest incident have taken an incredibly low settlement from the city with a perk that speaks to their interests.



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The latest financial losses include 3,819 unincorporated parcels with 100 structures valued at $2,016,962,239, and 2,907 homes and 86 commercial units lost in the city of Santa Rosa valued at $1.18 billion.”
“172 are still missing and 102,000 residents have been dislocated — about one-fifth of the entire population.”
“The U.S. Immigration & Customs Enforcement Agency (ICE) issued a detainer request on the Sonoma County Jail for Jesus Fabian Gonzalez, who was arrested Sunday on suspicion of arson in Wine Country fires.”
“Breitbart News reported earlier this week that Sonoma County Sheriffs had arrested Jesus Fabian Gonzalez, 29, at Maxwell Regional Park in Sonoma County after a series of reports of ongoing fires in the region.”
“Mr. Gonzalez was observed around 3:00 p.m. PDT wearing a jacket and walking “out of the creek area and a plume of smoke behind him,” according to the Santa Rosa Press Democrat.”
“Mr. Gonzalez, who is homeless and reportedly known by law enforcement to have been living under a nearby bridge, claimed he was cold and had lit the fire to stay warm.”
“But it was a balmy 78 degrees when he and the plume of smoke were first observed.”
“Mr. Gonzalez was booked into the Sonoma County Jail for suspicion of felony arson.”
“His bail was set at a steep $110,000, according to the Sonoma County Sheriff Public Information Officer.”
“Sargent Spencer Crum told Breitbart that Mr. Gonzalez is also on a U.S. Immigration & Customs Enforcement Agency (ICE) detainer request, despite Sonoma County declaring itself as a “sanctuary county” in May 2014.”


The latest financial losses include 3,819 unincorporated parcels with 100 structures valued at $2,016,962,239, and 2,907 homes and 86 commercial units lost in the city of Santa Rosa valued at $1.18 billion.
172 are still missing and 102,000 residents have been dislocated — about one-fifth of the entire population.
The U.S. Immigration & Customs Enforcement Agency (ICE) issued a detainer request on the Sonoma County Jail for Jesus Fabian Gonzalez, who was arrested Sunday on suspicion of arson in Wine Country fires.
Breitbart News reported earlier this week that Sonoma County Sheriffs had arrested Jesus Fabian Gonzalez, 29, at Maxwell Regional Park in Sonoma County after a series of reports of ongoing fires in the region.
Mr. Gonzalez was observed around 3:00 p.m. PDT wearing a jacket and walking “out of the creek area and a plume of smoke behind him,” according to the Santa Rosa Press Democrat.
Mr. Gonzalez, who is homeless and reportedly known by law enforcement to have been living under a nearby bridge, claimed he was cold and had lit the fire to stay warm.
But it was a balmy 78 degrees when he and the plume of smoke were first observed.
Mr. Gonzalez was booked into the Sonoma County Jail for suspicion of felony arson.
His bail was set at a steep $110,000, according to the Sonoma County Sheriff Public Information Officer.
Sargent Spencer Crum told Breitbart that Mr. Gonzalez is also on a U.S. Immigration & Customs Enforcement Agency (ICE) detainer request, despite Sonoma County declaring itself as a “sanctuary county” in May 2014.



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For example, Carter worked with former President Gerald Ford on the treaties which turned control of the Panama Canal over to Panama.”
“...staff said...”
““We need an independent media to hold people like me to account.”As for the travel ban, Bush was restrained but clear in his concern.”
““I consider the media to be indispensable to democracy,” Bush said in an interview with “Today” in February.”
“George W. Bush, meanwhile, has lobbed thinly veiled critiques of Trump on his approach to the press and the travel ban from some Muslim-majority countries.”
“While Trump and White House press secretary Sean Spicer have repeatedly denounced Obama for not revoking Flynn’s security clearance, Obama aides told reporters that Obama tried to warn Trump about Flynn’s erratic nature.”
“And on Monday, Obama’s aides aggressively pushed back against Trump for trying to blame his predecessor for the woes associated with Trump’s disgraced former national security adviser Michael Flynn.”
““I expect to be busy, if not with a second career, at least a second act,” Obama said Sunday.”
“At a speech in Boston on Sunday night, Obama avoided mentioning Trump by name, but again forcefully defended his signature health care legislation and mentioned immigration reform.”
“He also released a lengthy statement defending the Affordable Care Act against Trump’s attempts to repeal it.”
“Former aides say particularly on foreign policy issues, previous presidents and statesmen can be a valuable resource.”
“While in office, former presidents occasionally turn to their predecessors for guidance.”
“Obama, who campaigned heavily for Hillary Clinton, said he was “heartened” by the protests following Trump’s immigration ban targeting Muslim-majority countries.”
“However, he’s made his displeasure clear.”


For example, Carter worked with former President Gerald Ford on the treaties which turned control of the Panama Canal over to Panama.
...staff said...
“We need an independent media to hold people like me to account.”As for the travel ban, Bush was restrained but clear in his concern.
“I consider the media to be indispensable to democracy,” Bush said in an interview with “Today” in February.
George W. Bush, meanwhile, has lobbed thinly veiled critiques of Trump on his approach to the press and the travel ban from some Muslim-majority countries.
While Trump and White House press secretary Sean Spicer have repeatedly denounced Obama for not revoking Flynn’s security clearance, Obama aides told reporters that Obama tried to warn Trump about Flynn’s erratic nature.
And on Monday, Obama’s aides aggressively pushed back against Trump for trying to blame his predecessor for the woes associated with Trump’s disgraced former national security adviser Michael Flynn.
“I expect to be busy, if not with a second career, at least a second act,” Obama said Sunday.
At a speech in Boston on Sunday night, Obama avoided mentioning Trump by name, but again forcefully defended his signature health care legislation and mentioned immigration reform.
He also released a lengthy statement defending the Affordable Care Act against Trump’s attempts to repeal it.
Former aides say particularly on foreign policy issues, previous presidents and statesmen can be a valuable resource.
While in office, former presidents occasionally turn to their predecessors for guidance.
Obama, who campaigned heavily for Hillary Clinton, said he was “heartened” by the protests following Trump’s immigration ban targeting Muslim-majority countries.
However, he’s made his displeasure clear.



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"No one is prepared to normalise what is going on in the country right now," he said.”
“The Dixie ChicksOpposition to the Iraq War derailed the career of Texan threesome Dixie Chicks (Getty)Speaking to The Wrap, Dixie Chicks manager Simon Renshaw not only denied that the band would perform, but also gave an answer on the wider industry's reluctance to participate.”
“Why not ask Ted f***ing Nugent?”
“I've met Donald Trump, he was very nice to me, it's nothing personal, his political views are his own, mine are very different, I'm not a Republican in a million years.”
“"I'm British.”
“John added his own thoughts in an interview with the Guardian, where he said: "I don't really want my music to be involved in anything to do with an American election campaign.”
“He will NOT be performing."”
“Unfortunately John's publicist Fran Curtis came straight back with a statement to the New York Times: "Incorrect.”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here That sounded pretty definite...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”


"No one is prepared to normalise what is going on in the country right now," he said.
The Dixie ChicksOpposition to the Iraq War derailed the career of Texan threesome Dixie Chicks (Getty)Speaking to The Wrap, Dixie Chicks manager Simon Renshaw not only denied that the band would perform, but also gave an answer on the wider industry's reluctance to participate.
Why not ask Ted f***ing Nugent?
I've met Donald Trump, he was very nice to me, it's nothing personal, his political views are his own, mine are very different, I'm not a Republican in a million years.
"I'm British.
John added his own thoughts in an interview with the Guardian, where he said: "I don't really want my music to be involved in anything to do with an American election campaign.
He will NOT be performing."
Unfortunately John's publicist Fran Curtis came straight back with a statement to the New York Times: "Incorrect.
The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here That sounded pretty definite...
The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Japan has slaughtered over 6,000 whales since commercial whaling was made illegal by the International Whaling Commission (IWC) moratorium passed in 1986.”
““The waste of life is always a shame, but the whales are not to blame here, they were only doing what they are born to do: kill for food” he adds.”
““It seems Japan just doesn’t give a damn about international law” explains environmental activist and spokesman for Greenpeace Canada, James Ben Shahali, based in Vancouver.”
“The East Asian nation halted its annual Antarctic whaling mission after the U.N.’s International Court of Justice (ICJ) ruled last march the hunt violated an international moratorium on commercial whaling.”
“Antarctic...”
“The incident occurred in the Southern Ocean Whale Sanctuary near the South Eastern Coast of South Africa a controversial area to be whaling as a recent international court ruling has ordered the country to ends its whale hunt in the...”
“Within 30 minutes of the incident, 16 crew members had disappeared into the ocean.”
““The water was red with blood, there were bodies everywhere” he recalls in tears.”
““It was horrific” claims Asuka Kumara, a mechanical engineer who witnessed the gruesome scene.”
“The swimming crew members were then ferociously attacked by a school of killer whales, that decimated a large number of the crew within moments.”


Japan has slaughtered over 6,000 whales since commercial whaling was made illegal by the International Whaling Commission (IWC) moratorium passed in 1986.
“The waste of life is always a shame, but the whales are not to blame here, they were only doing what they are born to do: kill for food” he adds.
“It seems Japan just doesn’t give a damn about international law” explains environmental activist and spokesman for Greenpeace Canada, James Ben Shahali, based in Vancouver.
The East Asian nation halted its annual Antarctic whaling mission after the U.N.’s International Court of Justice (ICJ) ruled last march the hunt violated an international moratorium on commercial whaling.
Antarctic...
The incident occurred in the Southern Ocean Whale Sanctuary near the South Eastern Coast of South Africa a controversial area to be whaling as a recent international court ruling has ordered the country to ends its whale hunt in the...
Within 30 minutes of the incident, 16 crew members had disappeared into the ocean.
“The water was red with blood, there were bodies everywhere” he recalls in tears.
“It was horrific” claims Asuka Kumara, a mechanical engineer who witnessed the gruesome scene.
The swimming crew members were then ferociously attacked by a school of killer whales, that decimated a large number of the crew within moments.



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below and please share and like our Facebook Page.”
“Kellyanne Conway’s comments have caused reactions on social media especially on Twitter where she has been blasted as “a show off and trying to divert attention from the most important issues facing our country.”What do you think of her comments?”
“All they want is to see her doing a good job and not spinning facts around,” wrote James Collin, a New York based attorney and registered Democrat.”
“The American people don’t care if she looks like a model or not.”
““Making ridiculous claims that she’s being hated because of her good looks is as ridiculous as it gets.”
“...boss were doing a good job and being open and honest with the American people then she wouldn t have to face much criticism...”
“Kellyanne Conway counselor to President Trump claimed that Liberal women hate her because of her striking beauty and intellect in comments that were made to a reporter at a luncheon in Washington D C Pundits were quick to capitalise on her comments and tell her that if she and her...”


Let us know in the comments section below and please share and like our Facebook Page.
Kellyanne Conway’s comments have caused reactions on social media especially on Twitter where she has been blasted as “a show off and trying to divert attention from the most important issues facing our country.”What do you think of her comments?
All they want is to see her doing a good job and not spinning facts around,” wrote James Collin, a New York based attorney and registered Democrat.
The American people don’t care if she looks like a model or not.
“Making ridiculous claims that she’s being hated because of her good looks is as ridiculous as it gets.
...boss were doing a good job and being open and honest with the American people then she wouldn t have to face much criticism...
Kellyanne Conway counselor to President Trump claimed that Liberal women hate her because of her striking beauty and intellect in comments that were made to a reporter at a luncheon in Washington D C Pundits were quick to capitalise on her comments and tell her that if she and her...



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It beggars belief that an American president would engage in such a spectacle.”
“Now, we are told via twitter that today the president intends to announce his choice for the “most corrupt and dishonest” media awards.”
“For they are shameful, repulsive statements.”
“This alone should be a source of great shame for us in this body, especially for those of us in the president’s party.”
“It bears noting that so fraught with malice was the phrase “enemy of the people,” that even Nikita Khrushchev forbade its use, telling the Soviet Communist Party that the phrase had been introduced by Stalin for the purpose of “annihilating such individuals” who disagreed with the supreme leader.”
“Mr. President, it is a testament to the condition of our democracy that our own president uses words infamously spoken by Josef Stalin to describe his enemies.”
“This sign-up form is protected by reCAPTCHA and the Google Privacy Policy and Terms of Service apply.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time and you can contact us here.”
“POLITICO Playbook newsletter Sign up today to receive the #1-rated newsletter in politics Email Sign Up By signing up you agree to receive email newsletters or updates from POLITICO and you agree to our privacy policy and terms of service.”
““The enemy of the people,” was what the president of the United States called the free press in 2017.”


It beggars belief that an American president would engage in such a spectacle.
Now, we are told via twitter that today the president intends to announce his choice for the “most corrupt and dishonest” media awards.
For they are shameful, repulsive statements.
This alone should be a source of great shame for us in this body, especially for those of us in the president’s party.
It bears noting that so fraught with malice was the phrase “enemy of the people,” that even Nikita Khrushchev forbade its use, telling the Soviet Communist Party that the phrase had been introduced by Stalin for the purpose of “annihilating such individuals” who disagreed with the supreme leader.
Mr. President, it is a testament to the condition of our democracy that our own president uses words infamously spoken by Josef Stalin to describe his enemies.
This sign-up form is protected by reCAPTCHA and the Google Privacy Policy and Terms of Service apply.
You can unsubscribe at any time and you can contact us here.
POLITICO Playbook newsletter Sign up today to receive the #1-rated newsletter in politics Email Sign Up By signing up you agree to receive email newsletters or updates from POLITICO and you agree to our privacy policy and terms of service.
“The enemy of the people,” was what the president of the United States called the free press in 2017.



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...if you are interested in what I am tonight then email me...”
“...to keep this short but when you email me you can learn more...”
“I live alone and on my own im 25 i am in the north suburbs but can travel i dont care if you are in the city or suburbs i am pretty laid back and open minded i am going...”
“I went out women want real sex North Washington last night with friends and had a good time, so I want to have fun tonight as well.”
“I woke up late today so i plan or want to be up later tonight.”
“...so i posted an ad earlier but i am still looking because i havent found what im looking for yet... id love to go out tonight with someone or just hang out would be fine.”
“...still looking to hang out/meet up tonight...are you?”


...if you are interested in what I am tonight then email me...
...to keep this short but when you email me you can learn more...
I live alone and on my own im 25 i am in the north suburbs but can travel i dont care if you are in the city or suburbs i am pretty laid back and open minded i am going...
I went out women want real sex North Washington last night with friends and had a good time, so I want to have fun tonight as well.
I woke up late today so i plan or want to be up later tonight.
...so i posted an ad earlier but i am still looking because i havent found what im looking for yet... id love to go out tonight with someone or just hang out would be fine.
...still looking to hang out/meet up tonight...are you?



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Working with Facebook makes us look bad According to Breitbart one fact checker who has reportedly long worked with Facebook even referred to the social network as a terrible company declaring and on a personal level I don t want to have anything to do with them while another fact...”
““It’s worth asking how do they treat stories about George Soros on the platform knowing they specifically pay people to try to link political enemies to him?”
“And in the case of Snopes, their business model is a simple, yet devastatingly effective one since they partnered with Facebook and Google: They debunk viral news, and posts.”
“Being motivated by "facts" is apparently very lucrative.”
“During the lengthy and bitter legal dispute, CEO David Mikkelson also claimed to be underpaid and was demanding the "industry standard" or at least $360,000 a year.”
“Mikkelson's ex-wife Barbara, claimed in legal documents he embezzled $98,000 of company money and spent it on "himself and prostitutes."”
“According to a report by the Daily Mail, Snopes founder David Mikkelson was accused of embezzling thousands from the company.”
“Of course, it's understandable that a website has overheads that need to be covered, but when a company is primarily driven by profit, how can they be trusted to remain non-partisan?”
“Adsense asking for donations from readers via PayPal and has an active GoFundMe campaign to Save Snopes which has so far generated over 850 000 of its 2 million goal...”
“LaCapria said she was particularly upset to learn that Facebook was paying Snopes That felt really gross Facebook has one mission and fact checking websites should have a completely different mission Aside from allegedly being paid by Facebook Snopes also generates revenue by filling its website with advertisements from Google...”


Working with Facebook makes us look bad According to Breitbart one fact checker who has reportedly long worked with Facebook even referred to the social network as a terrible company declaring and on a personal level I don t want to have anything to do with them while another fact...
“It’s worth asking how do they treat stories about George Soros on the platform knowing they specifically pay people to try to link political enemies to him?
And in the case of Snopes, their business model is a simple, yet devastatingly effective one since they partnered with Facebook and Google: They debunk viral news, and posts.
Being motivated by "facts" is apparently very lucrative.
During the lengthy and bitter legal dispute, CEO David Mikkelson also claimed to be underpaid and was demanding the "industry standard" or at least $360,000 a year.
Mikkelson's ex-wife Barbara, claimed in legal documents he embezzled $98,000 of company money and spent it on "himself and prostitutes."
According to a report by the Daily Mail, Snopes founder David Mikkelson was accused of embezzling thousands from the company.
Of course, it's understandable that a website has overheads that need to be covered, but when a company is primarily driven by profit, how can they be trusted to remain non-partisan?
Adsense asking for donations from readers via PayPal and has an active GoFundMe campaign to Save Snopes which has so far generated over 850 000 of its 2 million goal...
LaCapria said she was particularly upset to learn that Facebook was paying Snopes That felt really gross Facebook has one mission and fact checking websites should have a completely different mission Aside from allegedly being paid by Facebook Snopes also generates revenue by filling its website with advertisements from Google...



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Defense counsel insists that there is additional exculpatory evidence the prosecution has yet to turn over to the defense and has asked the court to order Circuit Attorney Kim Gardner to produce it.”
“...answered, “Yes.”
“Eric Greitens has been the whereabouts of an incriminating photo that he is alleged to have taken and disseminated.”
“A deposition of the woman (K.S.)”
“...in question, the woman who accused Greitens of taking a nude photo of her, reveals one new shocking bit of evidence.”
“The woman may have dreamed up the incident at the heart of the criminal case.”
“The defense team’s April 8 motion to compel immediate production of all exculpatory evidence reports the following exchange.”
“When the defense counsel asked K.S., “Did you ever see [Greitens] in possession of a camera or phone?” she answered: “Not to my knowledge.”
“I didn’t see him with it.”The question was then asked, “And as you sit here now, you cannot state under oath that you ever saw him in possession of a camera – with a camera or a phone?”K.S.”
“...replied, “Correct.”The counsel then asked, “And you can’t say you saw it on his person, you can’t say you saw him put it down in the kitchen, take it from the kitchen, or put it down anywhere in the basement.”


Defense counsel insists that there is additional exculpatory evidence the prosecution has yet to turn over to the defense and has asked the court to order Circuit Attorney Kim Gardner to produce it.
...answered, “Yes.
Eric Greitens has been the whereabouts of an incriminating photo that he is alleged to have taken and disseminated.
A deposition of the woman (K.S.)
...in question, the woman who accused Greitens of taking a nude photo of her, reveals one new shocking bit of evidence.
The woman may have dreamed up the incident at the heart of the criminal case.
The defense team’s April 8 motion to compel immediate production of all exculpatory evidence reports the following exchange.
When the defense counsel asked K.S., “Did you ever see [Greitens] in possession of a camera or phone?” she answered: “Not to my knowledge.
I didn’t see him with it.”The question was then asked, “And as you sit here now, you cannot state under oath that you ever saw him in possession of a camera – with a camera or a phone?”K.S.
...replied, “Correct.”The counsel then asked, “And you can’t say you saw it on his person, you can’t say you saw him put it down in the kitchen, take it from the kitchen, or put it down anywhere in the basement.



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...illegal immigrantsillegal immigrantsillegal immigrants...”
“Has Big Tech Gone Too Far Banning the President?”
“Since the program began in May, 536 juveniles have been held — 248 of whom have been deported to Mexico after an average stay of 75 days, according to Border Patrol statistics.”
“Now, as a result of that decision, young Mexicans are being held for months without charge in shelters across the United States, sometimes without their parents’ knowledge.”
“You also agree to this site's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.”
“You may opt out at anytime.”
“Completing this poll grants you access to The Lid updates free of charge.”
“* Yes NoEmail *Comments This field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged.”
“...take our poll - story continues below Has Big Tech Gone Too Far Banning the President?”


...illegal immigrantsillegal immigrantsillegal immigrants...
Has Big Tech Gone Too Far Banning the President?
Since the program began in May, 536 juveniles have been held — 248 of whom have been deported to Mexico after an average stay of 75 days, according to Border Patrol statistics.
Now, as a result of that decision, young Mexicans are being held for months without charge in shelters across the United States, sometimes without their parents’ knowledge.
You also agree to this site's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.
You may opt out at anytime.
Completing this poll grants you access to The Lid updates free of charge.
* Yes NoEmail *Comments This field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged.
...take our poll - story continues below Has Big Tech Gone Too Far Banning the President?



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The parents say they are reaching out to an attorney, refusing to give any further statements.”
“The little boy is said to be in stable condition with no life-threatening injuries.”
“United Airlines released a statement saying the employee acted in a way that does not represent their company and has been fired.”
“The flight attendant was restrained in the back of the plane until the Pilot could make an emergency landing in Missouri.”
“It took several passengers to subdue the United Airlines employee.”
“...from the mother s arms and slapping him in the face...”
“Eyewitnesses say the little boy was screaming for about 38 minutes straight and the parents were asked by the flight attendant several times to quiet that annoying ass baby down After the 4th attempt to get the parents to comply the flight attendant erupted into a rage grabbing the baby...”
“The baby, whose name has not been released, was left with a welt mark across his face due to the assault.”
“He was pulled out of his seat and thrown into the aisle as seen on a video released on Monday.”
“This comes just hours after a man was dragged off of an overbooked United Airlines flight when he refused to get off the plane.”


The parents say they are reaching out to an attorney, refusing to give any further statements.
The little boy is said to be in stable condition with no life-threatening injuries.
United Airlines released a statement saying the employee acted in a way that does not represent their company and has been fired.
The flight attendant was restrained in the back of the plane until the Pilot could make an emergency landing in Missouri.
It took several passengers to subdue the United Airlines employee.
...from the mother s arms and slapping him in the face...
Eyewitnesses say the little boy was screaming for about 38 minutes straight and the parents were asked by the flight attendant several times to quiet that annoying ass baby down After the 4th attempt to get the parents to comply the flight attendant erupted into a rage grabbing the baby...
The baby, whose name has not been released, was left with a welt mark across his face due to the assault.
He was pulled out of his seat and thrown into the aisle as seen on a video released on Monday.
This comes just hours after a man was dragged off of an overbooked United Airlines flight when he refused to get off the plane.



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The President has 10 days to sign or veto the enrolled bill.”
“The Government Printing Office prints the revised bill in a process called enrolling.”
“The resulting bill returns to the House and Senate for final approval.”
“Finally, a conference committee made of House and Senate members works out any differences between the House and Senate versions of the bill.”
“Again, a simple majority (51 of 100) passes the bill.”
“In the Senate, the bill is assigned to another committee and, if released, debated and voted on.”
“If the bill passes by simple majority (218 of 435), the bill moves to the Senate.”
“If released by the committee, the bill is put on a calendar to be voted on, debated or amended.”
“The bill is then assigned to a committee for study.”
“First, a representative sponsors a bill.”


The President has 10 days to sign or veto the enrolled bill.
The Government Printing Office prints the revised bill in a process called enrolling.
The resulting bill returns to the House and Senate for final approval.
Finally, a conference committee made of House and Senate members works out any differences between the House and Senate versions of the bill.
Again, a simple majority (51 of 100) passes the bill.
In the Senate, the bill is assigned to another committee and, if released, debated and voted on.
If the bill passes by simple majority (218 of 435), the bill moves to the Senate.
If released by the committee, the bill is put on a calendar to be voted on, debated or amended.
The bill is then assigned to a committee for study.
First, a representative sponsors a bill.



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What a rip-off!”
“Note the loot she asked for, show up to see her, you had to pay $330000+.”
“2 in Muse, Washington County, posted the comment in response to the Steelers’ decision not to not take the field for the national anthem.”
“Fire chief apologizes for calling Steelers’ coach Mike Tomlin ‘n-word’ on Facebook | TribLIVEChief Paul Smith, who leads Cecil’s Volunteer Fire Department No.”
“Now, he should be rehabilitated, he needs a HUGE apology from the entire NFL leadership and his former teammates.”
“People are very angry at him for surrendering but then, he had everyone against him.”
“As I said above, Villanueva is the only member of that ‘team’ that stood up for America and he was then muscled by thugs threatening his life and livelihood and who forced him to do a miserable retraction of his good, patriotic deed.”
“Well, it isn’t working at all.”
“Like the DNC, they think they can impose their ideology on everyone else via force.”
“The NFL is now in dire straits.”


What a rip-off!
Note the loot she asked for, show up to see her, you had to pay $330000+.
2 in Muse, Washington County, posted the comment in response to the Steelers’ decision not to not take the field for the national anthem.
Fire chief apologizes for calling Steelers’ coach Mike Tomlin ‘n-word’ on Facebook | TribLIVEChief Paul Smith, who leads Cecil’s Volunteer Fire Department No.
Now, he should be rehabilitated, he needs a HUGE apology from the entire NFL leadership and his former teammates.
People are very angry at him for surrendering but then, he had everyone against him.
As I said above, Villanueva is the only member of that ‘team’ that stood up for America and he was then muscled by thugs threatening his life and livelihood and who forced him to do a miserable retraction of his good, patriotic deed.
Well, it isn’t working at all.
Like the DNC, they think they can impose their ideology on everyone else via force.
The NFL is now in dire straits.



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To an extent, the situation speaks for itself."”
“"Now we have the Justice Department showing up with a complaint about disclosures on a modest real estate matter.”
“Imran Awan, 37, was arrested on Monday by FBI agents and U.S. Capitol Police at Dulles International Airport trying to fly to Lahore, Pakistan.”
“Awan was arraigned in U.S. District Court on Tuesday with one count of bank fraud, a federal offense, and he pleaded not guilty.”
“Officials said Awan and his wife, Hina Alvi, defrauded the Congressional Federal Credit Union for $165,000 by lying on a home equity loan application, according to federal court documents.”
“Awan worked as an information technology staffer for Wasserman Schultz, a former chairwoman of the Democratic National Committee.”
“David Damron, a spokesman for her office, said he was fired Tuesday.”
“Congresswoman and DNC Chair Debbie Wasserman Schultz on December 19, 2015.”
“Pacific Press / LightRocket via Getty Images"Mr. Awan previously served as an employee in our office, but his services have been terminated," Damron said in a emailed statement.”
“Awan and his wife, who also worked as a House aide, applied for the loan in December last year and told the loan officer that their Virginia residence listed on the application to secure the loan was not used as a rental property, court documents said.”


To an extent, the situation speaks for itself."
"Now we have the Justice Department showing up with a complaint about disclosures on a modest real estate matter.
Imran Awan, 37, was arrested on Monday by FBI agents and U.S. Capitol Police at Dulles International Airport trying to fly to Lahore, Pakistan.
Awan was arraigned in U.S. District Court on Tuesday with one count of bank fraud, a federal offense, and he pleaded not guilty.
Officials said Awan and his wife, Hina Alvi, defrauded the Congressional Federal Credit Union for $165,000 by lying on a home equity loan application, according to federal court documents.
Awan worked as an information technology staffer for Wasserman Schultz, a former chairwoman of the Democratic National Committee.
David Damron, a spokesman for her office, said he was fired Tuesday.
Congresswoman and DNC Chair Debbie Wasserman Schultz on December 19, 2015.
Pacific Press / LightRocket via Getty Images"Mr. Awan previously served as an employee in our office, but his services have been terminated," Damron said in a emailed statement.
Awan and his wife, who also worked as a House aide, applied for the loan in December last year and told the loan officer that their Virginia residence listed on the application to secure the loan was not used as a rental property, court documents said.



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you are ready to join the opposition but aren’t quite sure how to get involved, take this grassroots call to action today!”
“This is terrifying, and there’s never been a more important time to stand up to fight and defend your country.”
“He only cares about his party.”
“He doesn’t care about the American people.”
“While McCaskill may not be smart enough to be in on the plan, he’s certainly complicit and he’s demonstrating what nearly all Republicans are guilty of.”
“Trump is a dictator.”
“With tweets saying the judges would be responsible for a terrorist attack, the administration is laying the groundwork for a deeper police state or for something we’ve never had in this country, martial law.”
“That’s right, he tweeted “Can’t wait for the next 9/11 so the 9th District circuit ruling judges will wish they didn’t roll over for enemies wishing death on America #MuslimBan.”Um, seem scary to you?”
“The worst tweet from McCaskill, though, was one from Friday, where he very literally wished for another 9/11 just to prove judges wrong.”
“He tweets with glee about global warming “hoaxes.” He tweets that Americans should boycott Nordstrom for removing Ivanka’s merchandise (they were, that’s why they pulled the line).”


If you are ready to join the opposition but aren’t quite sure how to get involved, take this grassroots call to action today!
This is terrifying, and there’s never been a more important time to stand up to fight and defend your country.
He only cares about his party.
He doesn’t care about the American people.
While McCaskill may not be smart enough to be in on the plan, he’s certainly complicit and he’s demonstrating what nearly all Republicans are guilty of.
Trump is a dictator.
With tweets saying the judges would be responsible for a terrorist attack, the administration is laying the groundwork for a deeper police state or for something we’ve never had in this country, martial law.
That’s right, he tweeted “Can’t wait for the next 9/11 so the 9th District circuit ruling judges will wish they didn’t roll over for enemies wishing death on America #MuslimBan.”Um, seem scary to you?
The worst tweet from McCaskill, though, was one from Friday, where he very literally wished for another 9/11 just to prove judges wrong.
He tweets with glee about global warming “hoaxes.” He tweets that Americans should boycott Nordstrom for removing Ivanka’s merchandise (they were, that’s why they pulled the line).



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source: Ladies of Liberty...”
“Instead, he chose to pull an illegally carried firearm from a concealed location and shot the two men.”
“In October of 2015, DeLisle was walking home from the local senior center when he was ambushed by a pair of young Muslims.”
“The men, Abdi Nadjeer Hallalla and Mustif Salabu, were already wanted for a crime spree that spanned nearly four years with dozens of victims.”
“They preyed on older Americans, often grabbing them off the street to beat and rob them.”
“Until they met DeLisle.”
“Now, Hallalla is in a wheelchair breathing through a tube and Salabu is dead.”
“DeLisle, who stormed the beach at Normandy as a young man, responded to the young men like any good Marine would.”
“He pulled a .22 from his ankle holster — which is “illegal” in California — and put both men down in seconds.”
“Prosecutors said that because the two men were unarmed and using threats instead of actually hurting DeLisle meant that there was no imminent danger and that the use of deadly force was “extreme and unnecessary.” The Dewey County Prosecutor explained in a press release:“Mr.”


Source: Ladies of Liberty...
Instead, he chose to pull an illegally carried firearm from a concealed location and shot the two men.
In October of 2015, DeLisle was walking home from the local senior center when he was ambushed by a pair of young Muslims.
The men, Abdi Nadjeer Hallalla and Mustif Salabu, were already wanted for a crime spree that spanned nearly four years with dozens of victims.
They preyed on older Americans, often grabbing them off the street to beat and rob them.
Until they met DeLisle.
Now, Hallalla is in a wheelchair breathing through a tube and Salabu is dead.
DeLisle, who stormed the beach at Normandy as a young man, responded to the young men like any good Marine would.
He pulled a .22 from his ankle holster — which is “illegal” in California — and put both men down in seconds.
Prosecutors said that because the two men were unarmed and using threats instead of actually hurting DeLisle meant that there was no imminent danger and that the use of deadly force was “extreme and unnecessary.” The Dewey County Prosecutor explained in a press release:“Mr.



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will keep you updated soon.”
“You can see the video below:This is the developing story.”
“This impoundment follows the capture of an Obama linked ship containing 4.2 tons of cocaine, the sources note.”
“The money raised from this drug flight was intended to be used to finance the operations of Daesh (formerly known as ISIS), the sources say.”
“As a result of this, an airplane filled with Afghan Heroin and North Korean amphetamines was impounded at Argyle International Airport on St. Vincent and the Grenadines in the Caribbean, the sources say.”
“Former US President Barack Obama, in custody of the US military police, has informed on his drug dealing bosses, according to sources in Japanese military intelligence.”


We will keep you updated soon.
You can see the video below:This is the developing story.
This impoundment follows the capture of an Obama linked ship containing 4.2 tons of cocaine, the sources note.
The money raised from this drug flight was intended to be used to finance the operations of Daesh (formerly known as ISIS), the sources say.
As a result of this, an airplane filled with Afghan Heroin and North Korean amphetamines was impounded at Argyle International Airport on St. Vincent and the Grenadines in the Caribbean, the sources say.
Former US President Barack Obama, in custody of the US military police, has informed on his drug dealing bosses, according to sources in Japanese military intelligence.



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Clearly, the fault for Kushner’s probable fate lies with Kushner himself for not seeking proper shelter.”
“Mass equals force times accelarated ions.”Eric Trump was a decorated mathematician at Oxford and scored well above genius on the Hershman-Rorytar Test.”
“The roof was what was designed to absorb the impact.”
“Those walls were just normal walls to keep cost down.”
“Who would ever think that the threat would come from the side?”
“He told the National Report that the reason the water was able to penetrate was simple physics:“I designed the building for an air raid.”
“The building, designed by Eric Trump, was supposed to be able to withstand bunker-busting bombs.”
“They were all in the “safe” building towards the rear of the property when the wave hit.”
“The staff at Mar-A-Lago had been sent home except for those who live on the property.”
“Several other properties on either side, including the home of guitar legend Kieth Richards, were also destroyed.”


Clearly, the fault for Kushner’s probable fate lies with Kushner himself for not seeking proper shelter.
Mass equals force times accelarated ions.”Eric Trump was a decorated mathematician at Oxford and scored well above genius on the Hershman-Rorytar Test.
The roof was what was designed to absorb the impact.
Those walls were just normal walls to keep cost down.
Who would ever think that the threat would come from the side?
He told the National Report that the reason the water was able to penetrate was simple physics:“I designed the building for an air raid.
The building, designed by Eric Trump, was supposed to be able to withstand bunker-busting bombs.
They were all in the “safe” building towards the rear of the property when the wave hit.
The staff at Mar-A-Lago had been sent home except for those who live on the property.
Several other properties on either side, including the home of guitar legend Kieth Richards, were also destroyed.



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts!”
“Is it all conspiracy garbage?”
“He claims he committed 37 assassinations for the American government between 1959 and 1972, including the actress and model, Marilyn Monroe.”
“Hodges says he has no regrets.”
“In amongst his many confessions, he admits to being a group member of five CIA agents, whose sole task was to carry out assassinations.”
“He also admits one of his assassinations being none other than Glamour icon, Marilyn Monroe, who was killed not just because of her ties with John F Kennedy, but also because she slept with Fidel Castro, ultimately making her a massive national security risk.”
“He claims he carried out 37 assassinations for the US Government between 1959 and 1972 including Marilyn Monroe.”
“Hodges had worked for the CIA.”
“Hodges was a CIA officer for 41 years working as an operative amongst top level security clearances, he claims he was employed as a hit-man by the organization, his duty was to assassinate individuals who posed a threat to the security of the United States of America.”


Let us know your thoughts!
Is it all conspiracy garbage?
He claims he committed 37 assassinations for the American government between 1959 and 1972, including the actress and model, Marilyn Monroe.
Hodges says he has no regrets.
In amongst his many confessions, he admits to being a group member of five CIA agents, whose sole task was to carry out assassinations.
He also admits one of his assassinations being none other than Glamour icon, Marilyn Monroe, who was killed not just because of her ties with John F Kennedy, but also because she slept with Fidel Castro, ultimately making her a massive national security risk.
He claims he carried out 37 assassinations for the US Government between 1959 and 1972 including Marilyn Monroe.
Hodges had worked for the CIA.
Hodges was a CIA officer for 41 years working as an operative amongst top level security clearances, he claims he was employed as a hit-man by the organization, his duty was to assassinate individuals who posed a threat to the security of the United States of America.



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And just in case you haven’t noticed, Trump’s people have most of the guns.”
“Install Hillary by force or some other act of politics, and you will have a civil war on your hands.”
“An unknown portion of these voters may have had their minds controlled by a Russian space-beam, agents close to the investigation say.”
“The allegation that 62 million Americans appear to be employed by Russian intelligence services has rocked the Bureau, and it is reported that multiple agents have taken their own lives, given that realizing just how deep this Russian hacking conspiracy runs blew their minds — literally.”
“This shocking new revelation comes after it was confirmed as a fact that Russia did Wikileaks because Donald Trump personally called Vladimir Putin and asked him to.”
“It was also revealed earlier this week that Alex Jones (real name “Alexi Jonesinov”) is a Russian sleeper agent who was ordered by the FSB (formerly the KGB) to post news articles on the internet saying that Donald Trump would be a good President.”
“However, the revelation that 62 million Americans are taking orders directly from the Kremlin is a revelation of a whole other order, which FBI agents are struggling with how to deal with.”
“It was determined by Puerto Rican federal judge Mizu Tomazaki that it is a crime to support Donald Trump or to post positive things about him on the internet.”
“9th circuit judges Weinberg, Steinman and Goldenstein upheld the ruling.”
“Despite this, the logistics of rounding up 62 million people and locking them in prison present a difficult task to overcome.”


And just in case you haven’t noticed, Trump’s people have most of the guns.
Install Hillary by force or some other act of politics, and you will have a civil war on your hands.
An unknown portion of these voters may have had their minds controlled by a Russian space-beam, agents close to the investigation say.
The allegation that 62 million Americans appear to be employed by Russian intelligence services has rocked the Bureau, and it is reported that multiple agents have taken their own lives, given that realizing just how deep this Russian hacking conspiracy runs blew their minds — literally.
This shocking new revelation comes after it was confirmed as a fact that Russia did Wikileaks because Donald Trump personally called Vladimir Putin and asked him to.
It was also revealed earlier this week that Alex Jones (real name “Alexi Jonesinov”) is a Russian sleeper agent who was ordered by the FSB (formerly the KGB) to post news articles on the internet saying that Donald Trump would be a good President.
However, the revelation that 62 million Americans are taking orders directly from the Kremlin is a revelation of a whole other order, which FBI agents are struggling with how to deal with.
It was determined by Puerto Rican federal judge Mizu Tomazaki that it is a crime to support Donald Trump or to post positive things about him on the internet.
9th circuit judges Weinberg, Steinman and Goldenstein upheld the ruling.
Despite this, the logistics of rounding up 62 million people and locking them in prison present a difficult task to overcome.



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share this post if you believe that President Trump will protect America!”
“Tell us what you think about McCain action in the comments below.”
“Even if it had, that still does not mean that President Trump was not doing what he vowed to do, which is protecting America.”
“Both President Trump and Prime Minister Turnbull have denied any acrimony occurred during their phone call.”
“Australia had denied access to the immigrants based upon security concerns and would not have refused entry to the refugees and detained them offshore without a valid reason.”
“Former President Barack Obama created the deal shortly before leaving the office.”
“Among the conflicting reports by CNN about the conversation between Trump and his Australian counterpart, Senator McCain called to offer his “unwavering support” to the foreign leader.”
“Even if McCain is still the sitting Senator from Arizona, that does not exempt him from the dictates of the Logan Act.”
“Australia does far more than its fair share to protect and promote...”
“McCain claimed that he asked Ambassador Hockey to convey to the people of Australia that their American brothers and sisters value our historic alliance honor the sacrifice of the Australians who have served and are serving by our side and remain committed to the safer freer and better world that...”


Share this post if you believe that President Trump will protect America!
Tell us what you think about McCain action in the comments below.
Even if it had, that still does not mean that President Trump was not doing what he vowed to do, which is protecting America.
Both President Trump and Prime Minister Turnbull have denied any acrimony occurred during their phone call.
Australia had denied access to the immigrants based upon security concerns and would not have refused entry to the refugees and detained them offshore without a valid reason.
Former President Barack Obama created the deal shortly before leaving the office.
Among the conflicting reports by CNN about the conversation between Trump and his Australian counterpart, Senator McCain called to offer his “unwavering support” to the foreign leader.
Even if McCain is still the sitting Senator from Arizona, that does not exempt him from the dictates of the Logan Act.
Australia does far more than its fair share to protect and promote...
McCain claimed that he asked Ambassador Hockey to convey to the people of Australia that their American brothers and sisters value our historic alliance honor the sacrifice of the Australians who have served and are serving by our side and remain committed to the safer freer and better world that...



**Something goes wrong**
“House Oversign Committee Chair Rep. Jason Chaffetz, R-Utah, asked for the alleged Comey memo and other documents.”
“Even a Republican, Rep. Justin Amash, claimed Wednesday there are grounds to impeach President Trump.”
“To put that in perspective, these casualties exceed the nation’s loss in all its other wars, from the Revolution through Vietnam.”
“That war came at a high price, as many as 700,000 Americans died fighting for what they believe in.”
“One Hundred and Fifty-Seven years ago the Democrats waged a war against the First Republican President Abraham Lincoln for giving Blacks their freedom.”
“It should be noted that the Democratic Party has already done this once before.”
“Democrats are well schooled in such things probably because of their close alliance with Marxist regimes that can only gain power by seizing it through bloody civil wars.”
“...sheriff wasn t interested in joining them in the swamp so they launched what can only be characterized as a coup attempt...”
“...agent with intimate knowledge of the inner workings of the Clinton case told us that they uncovered evidence of such massive corruption that the agents involved realized that damned near the entire government could be brought down The criminal co conspirators in both parties realized almost immediately that the new...”
“Well, there was one additional promise that Trump made on his way to the White House that has some Republicans joining with Democrats and quaking in their boots, Trump’s promise to “Drain the Swamp.”As we reported yesterday, “An F.B.I.”


House Oversign Committee Chair Rep. Jason Chaffetz, R-Utah, asked for the alleged Comey memo and other documents.
Even a Republican, Rep. Justin Amash, claimed Wednesday there are grounds to impeach President Trump.
To put that in perspective, these casualties exceed the nation’s loss in all its other wars, from the Revolution through Vietnam.
That war came at a high price, as many as 700,000 Americans died fighting for what they believe in.
One Hundred and Fifty-Seven years ago the Democrats waged a war against the First Republican President Abraham Lincoln for giving Blacks their freedom.
It should be noted that the Democratic Party has already done this once before.
Democrats are well schooled in such things probably because of their close alliance with Marxist regimes that can only gain power by seizing it through bloody civil wars.
...sheriff wasn t interested in joining them in the swamp so they launched what can only be characterized as a coup attempt...
...agent with intimate knowledge of the inner workings of the Clinton case told us that they uncovered evidence of such massive corruption that the agents involved realized that damned near the entire government could be brought down The criminal co conspirators in both parties realized almost immediately that the new...
Well, there was one additional promise that Trump made on his way to the White House that has some Republicans joining with Democrats and quaking in their boots, Trump’s promise to “Drain the Swamp.”As we reported yesterday, “An F.B.I.



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“*** UPDATE- Anyone who believes this story or any other story on this website needs to read this post ***.”
“It just doesn’t make sense to me”After last night’s demonstration where several democrats in leadership roles refused to stand while the widow was being honored, Goldberg continues to make the point that liberals lack a significant amount of class.”
“How can someone who is truly greiving go out there and be on TV.”
““If it were me I wouldn’t be able to leave the house.”
“These military widows love their 15 minutes in the spotlight”, Goldberg said.”
““She was just looking for attention.”
“Whoopi Goldberg is in hot water after comments she made Wednesday regarding the Navy SEAL widow that was honored last night during President Donald Trump’s historical speech.”


*** UPDATE- Anyone who believes this story or any other story on this website needs to read this post ***.
It just doesn’t make sense to me”After last night’s demonstration where several democrats in leadership roles refused to stand while the widow was being honored, Goldberg continues to make the point that liberals lack a significant amount of class.
How can someone who is truly greiving go out there and be on TV.
“If it were me I wouldn’t be able to leave the house.
These military widows love their 15 minutes in the spotlight”, Goldberg said.
“She was just looking for attention.
Whoopi Goldberg is in hot water after comments she made Wednesday regarding the Navy SEAL widow that was honored last night during President Donald Trump’s historical speech.



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The latest food stamp numbers show that the downward trend over the past year — and every year after 2013 — is continuing.”
“Over the past year since President Donald Trump took office, enrollment in SNAP dropped by two million.”
“The Trump administration announced that it would adopt some of these state welfare reform measures — such as requiring food stamp recipients to work a certain number of hours per week — and implement them at the federal level, causing nationwide food stamp enrollment to plunge even further.”
“But it also highlights an ongoing downward trend in food stamp enrollment that has been going on for several years since state legislatures enacted welfare reform measures designed to get people back into the workforce.”
“The sharp decline in food stamp enrollment over one month reflects how states like Florida have curtailed their temporary food stamp benefit programs for those affected by natural disasters.”
“Sims added that DCF handed out D-SNAP benefits totaling more than $1 billion to 3.1 million people in the months following Hurricane Irma, but the state curtailed its D-SNAP benefit program on December 3.”
“To qualify for the federal disaster food assistance program, individuals must have lived or worked in one of the 48 declared counties on September 5, and NOT be a customer in the regular food assistance program,” said DCF Communications Director Jessica Sims.”
““The dramatic increase in SNAP recipients in the fall was related to the state’s administration of the federal disaster SNAP program following the impact of Hurricane Irma.”
“...the food stamp program...”
“A spokesperson for Florida s Department of Children and Families DCF the program that administers food stamp benefits in Florida confirmed with Breitbart News that the dramatic increase in SNAP enrollment in the state was due to disaster relief but that most food stamp recipients were not normal beneficiaries of...”


The latest food stamp numbers show that the downward trend over the past year — and every year after 2013 — is continuing.
Over the past year since President Donald Trump took office, enrollment in SNAP dropped by two million.
The Trump administration announced that it would adopt some of these state welfare reform measures — such as requiring food stamp recipients to work a certain number of hours per week — and implement them at the federal level, causing nationwide food stamp enrollment to plunge even further.
But it also highlights an ongoing downward trend in food stamp enrollment that has been going on for several years since state legislatures enacted welfare reform measures designed to get people back into the workforce.
The sharp decline in food stamp enrollment over one month reflects how states like Florida have curtailed their temporary food stamp benefit programs for those affected by natural disasters.
Sims added that DCF handed out D-SNAP benefits totaling more than $1 billion to 3.1 million people in the months following Hurricane Irma, but the state curtailed its D-SNAP benefit program on December 3.
To qualify for the federal disaster food assistance program, individuals must have lived or worked in one of the 48 declared counties on September 5, and NOT be a customer in the regular food assistance program,” said DCF Communications Director Jessica Sims.
“The dramatic increase in SNAP recipients in the fall was related to the state’s administration of the federal disaster SNAP program following the impact of Hurricane Irma.
...the food stamp program...
A spokesperson for Florida s Department of Children and Families DCF the program that administers food stamp benefits in Florida confirmed with Breitbart News that the dramatic increase in SNAP enrollment in the state was due to disaster relief but that most food stamp recipients were not normal beneficiaries of...



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(h/t Young Conservatives)”
“What do you think about this whole mess?”
“He has been doing everything he can to mess up what Trump is doing.”
“And being a liberal elite, he can get away with it.”
“Everywhere President Donald Trump goes, Obama shows up too.”
“A little odd, no?”
“This concerning practice has gotten on the last nerve of the Trump administration and it shows that they are concerned with what Obama is trying to do.”
“Obama needs to realize that he is no longer the president, no matter how much he wants to be.”
“Obama first went to Italy when Trump was there to try to disrupt what was going on there.”
“Does he not know when to give up?”


(h/t Young Conservatives)
What do you think about this whole mess?
He has been doing everything he can to mess up what Trump is doing.
And being a liberal elite, he can get away with it.
Everywhere President Donald Trump goes, Obama shows up too.
A little odd, no?
This concerning practice has gotten on the last nerve of the Trump administration and it shows that they are concerned with what Obama is trying to do.
Obama needs to realize that he is no longer the president, no matter how much he wants to be.
Obama first went to Italy when Trump was there to try to disrupt what was going on there.
Does he not know when to give up?



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Immigrants, however, never made up a majority of the population of Bristol County, where Fall River lies, even at their early 20th Century peak.”
“Later, at the end of the 19th Century a wave of immigrants swelled the town’s population.”
“Industrialization began when Col. Joseph Durfee, a native-born Revolutionary War hero built the first factory in 1811.”
“A native-born family, the Bordens ran a mill in what became the town for generations before and after the American revolution.”
“...not immigrants but colonists...”
“Rep Joe Kennedy III D MA claimed the host city of his response to President Donald Trump s State of the Union address Fall River Massachusetts was built by immigrants Fact Check MOSTLY FALSE What is now Fall River was first established in the 1600s by English settlers who were...”


Immigrants, however, never made up a majority of the population of Bristol County, where Fall River lies, even at their early 20th Century peak.
Later, at the end of the 19th Century a wave of immigrants swelled the town’s population.
Industrialization began when Col. Joseph Durfee, a native-born Revolutionary War hero built the first factory in 1811.
A native-born family, the Bordens ran a mill in what became the town for generations before and after the American revolution.
...not immigrants but colonists...
Rep Joe Kennedy III D MA claimed the host city of his response to President Donald Trump s State of the Union address Fall River Massachusetts was built by immigrants Fact Check MOSTLY FALSE What is now Fall River was first established in the 1600s by English settlers who were...



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Post also cited one unidentified person familiar with the effort as saying that Trump has asked his advisers about his authority to grant pardons to aides, family members or even himself.”
“...of interest in overseeing the investigation...”
“Nearly everyone who knows him seems to agree that Rod Rosenstein, the Deputy Attorney General and the official overseeing the special counsel Robert Mueller’s investigation of links between the Trump campaign and Russia, has a reputation for integrity.”
“Rod who is described by Jim Trusty, the former head of the Justice Department’s organized-crime division as a prosecutor, not a persecutor, had sought earlier to protect his good image by not taking a hastened decision to fire anyone without justifiable reasons.”
“But Trump could not fire Mueller directly, according to the law that authorizes Mueller’s probe, so the only possible way is to throw the Justice Department into upheaval by firing Deputy Attorney General Rosenstein who only holds the key Mueller’s expulsion.”
“Only the person acting as attorney general and Rod Rosenstein who was on matters related to the probe could fire Mueller and he said he won t do it without good cause So Trump would first had to purge the upper ranks of the Justice Department until he finds someone...”
“...willing to follow his orders and dismiss the special counsel...”
“Conflicting reports claim Rosenstein had resigned but it’s understood that Donald Trump made the decision to remove him after a review from his chief of staff, John Kelly.”
“UNDER the best of circumstances—when America has a president who is disciplined, willing to hear harsh but necessary truths and loyal to those he trusts—the post of Attorney General is “perhaps one of the most powerful job in Washington”, according to Loretta Lynch.”
“Loretta Elizabeth Lynch, an American attorney who served as the 83rd Attorney General of the United States, appointed by President Barack Obama in 2015 to succeed Eric Holder.”


The Post also cited one unidentified person familiar with the effort as saying that Trump has asked his advisers about his authority to grant pardons to aides, family members or even himself.
...of interest in overseeing the investigation...
Nearly everyone who knows him seems to agree that Rod Rosenstein, the Deputy Attorney General and the official overseeing the special counsel Robert Mueller’s investigation of links between the Trump campaign and Russia, has a reputation for integrity.
Rod who is described by Jim Trusty, the former head of the Justice Department’s organized-crime division as a prosecutor, not a persecutor, had sought earlier to protect his good image by not taking a hastened decision to fire anyone without justifiable reasons.
But Trump could not fire Mueller directly, according to the law that authorizes Mueller’s probe, so the only possible way is to throw the Justice Department into upheaval by firing Deputy Attorney General Rosenstein who only holds the key Mueller’s expulsion.
Only the person acting as attorney general and Rod Rosenstein who was on matters related to the probe could fire Mueller and he said he won t do it without good cause So Trump would first had to purge the upper ranks of the Justice Department until he finds someone...
...willing to follow his orders and dismiss the special counsel...
Conflicting reports claim Rosenstein had resigned but it’s understood that Donald Trump made the decision to remove him after a review from his chief of staff, John Kelly.
UNDER the best of circumstances—when America has a president who is disciplined, willing to hear harsh but necessary truths and loyal to those he trusts—the post of Attorney General is “perhaps one of the most powerful job in Washington”, according to Loretta Lynch.
Loretta Elizabeth Lynch, an American attorney who served as the 83rd Attorney General of the United States, appointed by President Barack Obama in 2015 to succeed Eric Holder.



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That would be a fine example of God’s wrath aimed at what is, in my opinion, a terrible misuse of our Maker’s good name.”/religionlo.com/Commentscomments...”
“If it were up to me, I would put every single woman or girl who does that in jail.”
“In fact, one of the Ten Commandments in the Old Testament states: “You shall not take the name of the Lord your God in vain, for the Lord will not hold him guiltless who takes his name in vain” (Exodus 20:7).”
“The word “vain” means “for no reason” or “useless.”“Thus, God was instructing the Israelites to avoid using his name in a useless, disrespectful way.”
“Instead, the Israelites were supposed to revere the name of God and use it in a serious, considerate way.”
“Many of the ancient Israelites were so respectful of the name of God that they would not even pronounce it or write it for fear of using it in vain.”
“Those who did write it would often throw away the quill they had used, because they thought that any quill that had written God’s name was holy and should not be used for regular words.”
““Dr.”
“John Hagee, the founder and senior pastor of the Cornerstone Church in San Antonio, Texas, not only agrees with what the Good Book says, but also takes the faith to a level of fanaticism.”
“Speaking exclusively with Newslo Hagee stated that in this world of crimes and deaths that surround us a simple blasphemy does not get that much attention when it should Saying the Lord s name in vain might seem petite and insignificant compared to some of the things that are going...”


That would be a fine example of God’s wrath aimed at what is, in my opinion, a terrible misuse of our Maker’s good name.”/religionlo.com/Commentscomments...
If it were up to me, I would put every single woman or girl who does that in jail.
In fact, one of the Ten Commandments in the Old Testament states: “You shall not take the name of the Lord your God in vain, for the Lord will not hold him guiltless who takes his name in vain” (Exodus 20:7).
The word “vain” means “for no reason” or “useless.”“Thus, God was instructing the Israelites to avoid using his name in a useless, disrespectful way.
Instead, the Israelites were supposed to revere the name of God and use it in a serious, considerate way.
Many of the ancient Israelites were so respectful of the name of God that they would not even pronounce it or write it for fear of using it in vain.
Those who did write it would often throw away the quill they had used, because they thought that any quill that had written God’s name was holy and should not be used for regular words.
“Dr.
John Hagee, the founder and senior pastor of the Cornerstone Church in San Antonio, Texas, not only agrees with what the Good Book says, but also takes the faith to a level of fanaticism.
Speaking exclusively with Newslo Hagee stated that in this world of crimes and deaths that surround us a simple blasphemy does not get that much attention when it should Saying the Lord s name in vain might seem petite and insignificant compared to some of the things that are going...



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Our thoughts and prayers remain with the people of Las Vegas and again it’s our most fervent prayer we get enough security to make life fright-free again in the Nevada city.”
“Paddock shot and killed himself; Las Vegas Metro Police officers found him dead in the room.”
“A gunman, now identified as 64-year-old Stephen Paddock, opened fire on a country-music festival from a hotel window inside the nearby Mandalay Bay.”
“It’s being reported by outlets as the deadliest mass shooting in the history of the United States.”
“More than 50 people were killed and more than 500 more injured in a terrifying massacre Sunday night.”
““Las Vegas we are praying for you,” Khloé Kardashian tweeted immediately after announcing the family’s donation.”
“But we know several people have been bereaved or victimized and now face the daunting challenge of putting lives and communities back together fearsomely, and we’re using our unique resources and reach to help those in need.”-the family continued.”
“The most decorated family said it’s hard to fully appreciate the impact, in part because people are still recovering from the historic tragedy.”
““Our hearts go out to everyone in the devastating path of this historic mass shooting,” said Kim Kardashian.”
“Across our social platforms, there will be a #DayofGiving call-to-action to donate to the victims of Las vegas shooting, with those dollars going to benefit those most impacted, the statement read.”


Our thoughts and prayers remain with the people of Las Vegas and again it’s our most fervent prayer we get enough security to make life fright-free again in the Nevada city.
Paddock shot and killed himself; Las Vegas Metro Police officers found him dead in the room.
A gunman, now identified as 64-year-old Stephen Paddock, opened fire on a country-music festival from a hotel window inside the nearby Mandalay Bay.
It’s being reported by outlets as the deadliest mass shooting in the history of the United States.
More than 50 people were killed and more than 500 more injured in a terrifying massacre Sunday night.
“Las Vegas we are praying for you,” Khloé Kardashian tweeted immediately after announcing the family’s donation.
But we know several people have been bereaved or victimized and now face the daunting challenge of putting lives and communities back together fearsomely, and we’re using our unique resources and reach to help those in need.”-the family continued.
The most decorated family said it’s hard to fully appreciate the impact, in part because people are still recovering from the historic tragedy.
“Our hearts go out to everyone in the devastating path of this historic mass shooting,” said Kim Kardashian.
Across our social platforms, there will be a #DayofGiving call-to-action to donate to the victims of Las vegas shooting, with those dollars going to benefit those most impacted, the statement read.



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in the Rocky Mountain State...”
“SIDENOTE An inside source with the organization said that it appears that the strain of marijuana that will be used in the making of the marijuana brownies will be Durango Bango which is considered to be the very best weed...”
“What better way to sell concessions that to give everyone in the stadium the munchies?”
“The Rockies head office is hoping that the sale of marijuana brownies will also boost sales of other concession items.”
“High ranking officials in the Rockies organization say they are thrilled at the new menu item since they note that it will bring in tens of thousands of dollars per month.”
“An official within the Rockies organization stated that the Rockies organization has given the green light to concession stands selling marijuana brownies.”
“Pot Brownies.”
“The first item on the list?”
“Sources are reporting that Major League Baseball’s Colorado Rockies plan to sell food items which contain marijuana at concession stands during games next season.”
“...state...”


...in the Rocky Mountain State...
SIDENOTE An inside source with the organization said that it appears that the strain of marijuana that will be used in the making of the marijuana brownies will be Durango Bango which is considered to be the very best weed...
What better way to sell concessions that to give everyone in the stadium the munchies?
The Rockies head office is hoping that the sale of marijuana brownies will also boost sales of other concession items.
High ranking officials in the Rockies organization say they are thrilled at the new menu item since they note that it will bring in tens of thousands of dollars per month.
An official within the Rockies organization stated that the Rockies organization has given the green light to concession stands selling marijuana brownies.
Pot Brownies.
The first item on the list?
Sources are reporting that Major League Baseball’s Colorado Rockies plan to sell food items which contain marijuana at concession stands during games next season.
...state...



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if your point is it is not just Al Franken you are absolutely right.”Not long ago Mitt Romney also stated that President Trump is “trying to divide us up by the color of our skin.””
“We have a president of the United States who acknowledged on a tape widely seen all over the country that he’s assaulted women, so I would hope maybe the president of the United States might pay attention of what’s going on and also think about resigning.”
“But, yes, I do think he should resign.”Romney continued, “Let me take it a little step further.”
“I don’t.”
“Do I think he will?”
“I do.”
“This is a guy who was on a tape seen by everybody in America essentially bragging about his sexual assault of women.”“Do I think under those considerations of Al Franken resigned, do I think the president should resign?”
“It’s already bad and he is adding fuel to the fire.”Romney added, “You’ve got a president who has been accused, by many, many women of harassment, to say the least.”
“...ve got a president who has some very serious emotional problems I m especially concerned about his constant tweets about North Korea...”
“AMID AN INTERVIEW ON CNN S AC360 FORMER PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE MITT ROMNEY URGED PRESIDENT TRUMP TO LEAVE OFFICE OVER THE SEXUAL MISCONDUCT CLAIMS AGAINST HIM AND COMMENTED THAT THE PRESIDENT HAS SOME VERY SERIOUS EMOTIONAL PROBLEMS Romney shared his opinion on Trump s controversial tweets by sayin I think you...”


But if your point is it is not just Al Franken you are absolutely right.”Not long ago Mitt Romney also stated that President Trump is “trying to divide us up by the color of our skin.”
We have a president of the United States who acknowledged on a tape widely seen all over the country that he’s assaulted women, so I would hope maybe the president of the United States might pay attention of what’s going on and also think about resigning.
But, yes, I do think he should resign.”Romney continued, “Let me take it a little step further.
I don’t.
Do I think he will?
I do.
This is a guy who was on a tape seen by everybody in America essentially bragging about his sexual assault of women.”“Do I think under those considerations of Al Franken resigned, do I think the president should resign?
It’s already bad and he is adding fuel to the fire.”Romney added, “You’ve got a president who has been accused, by many, many women of harassment, to say the least.
...ve got a president who has some very serious emotional problems I m especially concerned about his constant tweets about North Korea...
AMID AN INTERVIEW ON CNN S AC360 FORMER PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE MITT ROMNEY URGED PRESIDENT TRUMP TO LEAVE OFFICE OVER THE SEXUAL MISCONDUCT CLAIMS AGAINST HIM AND COMMENTED THAT THE PRESIDENT HAS SOME VERY SERIOUS EMOTIONAL PROBLEMS Romney shared his opinion on Trump s controversial tweets by sayin I think you...



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Maybe if they took their heads out of their asses long enough to even listen to Trump’s goals for his time in office they would feel differentWatch one news network’s story on the matter:”
“Let’s hope that for the sake of everyone else in Hollywood these ignorant celebrities suck it up and deal with the fact that their candidate didn’t win.”
“The fact remains that Donald Trump is our President, whether they like it or not, and that isn’t about to change.”
““And they’re not getting the bazillion dollar deals.”It’s about time that these jerkoffs realize that they aren’t the only people in this world.”
““The people who do all the real work in Hollywood are the people who build the sets, who make the costumes, who create the props, and in some cases, do the stunts and the special effects,”Mike explained.”
“He mentioned the lower paid support staff who do all of the behind the scenes work.”
“Mike Opelka called out the rich actors and directors who were threatening the strike, warning them of the damage this strike would cause to everyone else in the industry.”
“The fact that people like Rosie O’Donnell think that the movie and television industry wouldn’t survive without them proves just how ignorant they really are.”
“We don’t need jerks like you in Hollywood anyway.”
“Our message to them, DO IT.”


Maybe if they took their heads out of their asses long enough to even listen to Trump’s goals for his time in office they would feel differentWatch one news network’s story on the matter:
Let’s hope that for the sake of everyone else in Hollywood these ignorant celebrities suck it up and deal with the fact that their candidate didn’t win.
The fact remains that Donald Trump is our President, whether they like it or not, and that isn’t about to change.
“And they’re not getting the bazillion dollar deals.”It’s about time that these jerkoffs realize that they aren’t the only people in this world.
“The people who do all the real work in Hollywood are the people who build the sets, who make the costumes, who create the props, and in some cases, do the stunts and the special effects,”Mike explained.
He mentioned the lower paid support staff who do all of the behind the scenes work.
Mike Opelka called out the rich actors and directors who were threatening the strike, warning them of the damage this strike would cause to everyone else in the industry.
The fact that people like Rosie O’Donnell think that the movie and television industry wouldn’t survive without them proves just how ignorant they really are.
We don’t need jerks like you in Hollywood anyway.
Our message to them, DO IT.



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share this: TwitterFacebook...”
“Then he cuts off all the lean meat and throws it away, leaving just the pieces of fat which he then eats individually with pieces of the crispy skin he peeled off.”
“Mead reportedly decided to resign because President Donald Trump hasn’t utilized her culinary talents even once the entire time he has been living in the White House.”
““It’s kind of crazy because Lisa is such a good chef,” said Kurt Reno, the White House aide who recommended Ms. Mead for the job.”
““But Lisa feels insulted because the President has ordered fast food for literally every single meal he’s eaten in D.C.”
“The only food related duty Lisa has done for the past six months is retrieve Trump s orders from drive through windows and scoop the President s ice cream from the carton Mr Trump s favorite fast food choices are...”
“...reportedly Kentucky Fried Chicken and McDonalds and he eats his fried chicken burgers and fries with a knife and fork according to a White House staffer who requested anonymity to avoid consequences from leaking about the President s eating habits...”
“...to the press...”
““It’s borderline creepy,” the staffer said.”
““The first thing Trump does with his fried chicken is pick off all the skin from every piece like he’s dissecting the chickens with a scalpel or something, and then he puts it all in a pile.”


Share this: TwitterFacebook...
Then he cuts off all the lean meat and throws it away, leaving just the pieces of fat which he then eats individually with pieces of the crispy skin he peeled off.
Mead reportedly decided to resign because President Donald Trump hasn’t utilized her culinary talents even once the entire time he has been living in the White House.
“It’s kind of crazy because Lisa is such a good chef,” said Kurt Reno, the White House aide who recommended Ms. Mead for the job.
“But Lisa feels insulted because the President has ordered fast food for literally every single meal he’s eaten in D.C.
The only food related duty Lisa has done for the past six months is retrieve Trump s orders from drive through windows and scoop the President s ice cream from the carton Mr Trump s favorite fast food choices are...
...reportedly Kentucky Fried Chicken and McDonalds and he eats his fried chicken burgers and fries with a knife and fork according to a White House staffer who requested anonymity to avoid consequences from leaking about the President s eating habits...
...to the press...
“It’s borderline creepy,” the staffer said.
“The first thing Trump does with his fried chicken is pick off all the skin from every piece like he’s dissecting the chickens with a scalpel or something, and then he puts it all in a pile.



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So while these voters are still diligently voting, it is very doubtful they are 112 years old.”
“These voters were automatically assigned a default birth date of 01/01/1900 in the state’s voter rolls.”
“While most voters who registered before NVRA did provide birth dates, some did not.”
“Prior to passage of the National Voter Registration Act (NVRA) in 1993, the state did not require those registering to provide their birth date.”
“The true explanation is much less exciting.”
“Neither, according to the State Board of Elections.”
“Have this many centenarians actually been voting in North Carolina, or is this a sign of voter fraud as some have asked?”
“In fact in 2008, almost 10,000 108-year olds cast ballots and just over 9,000 110-year olds voted in 2010.”
“Early voting began in North Carolina in October, and soon after almost 900 voters aged 112 reportedly cast ballots.”


So while these voters are still diligently voting, it is very doubtful they are 112 years old.
These voters were automatically assigned a default birth date of 01/01/1900 in the state’s voter rolls.
While most voters who registered before NVRA did provide birth dates, some did not.
Prior to passage of the National Voter Registration Act (NVRA) in 1993, the state did not require those registering to provide their birth date.
The true explanation is much less exciting.
Neither, according to the State Board of Elections.
Have this many centenarians actually been voting in North Carolina, or is this a sign of voter fraud as some have asked?
In fact in 2008, almost 10,000 108-year olds cast ballots and just over 9,000 110-year olds voted in 2010.
Early voting began in North Carolina in October, and soon after almost 900 voters aged 112 reportedly cast ballots.



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 1916, a deadly shark attack near Presque Ile beach, in Lake Eerie, made national headlines, forcing local authorities to ban swimming in the region for over 14 years until the ban was lifted in 1930.”
“U.S. Coast Guards reassured local residents that the occurrence of such a predator in the region’s waters “is highly unlikely” as sharks are not well adapted to freshwater systems.”
“According to authorities more than a hundred people reported missing in the area in the last decade may have fallen under the fangs of the gigantic beast, several local residents even suspecting its presence for a long time.”
““It is also possible it traveled to the region through underwater tunnels that interconnect between the Great Lakes,” he told reporters.”
“Either rising sea temperatures and depleted fish stocks possibly led the shark to adventure itself further into the Great Lakes region.” he admits, visibly puzzled.”
“Professor of biology at the University of Illinois, Allan Jameson said: “This is not common to find such a beast so far inland.”
“The great white shark estimated at more than 1.2 tons is the biggest fish ever caught in the region, believe experts.”
““I’d heard of the Lake Michigan monster, but never did I expect to catch it myself,” claims the 63-year-old Canadian tourist.”
““We reeled in the beast for a good 4-5 hours before my friend Allan finally shot it with a rifle and wounded it to the head” explains O’Keef.”
“Canadian tourist, John O’Keef and his friend from Chicago, Allan Brooks captured the 3,000-pound beast while fishing for sturgeon in Michigan Lake.”


In 1916, a deadly shark attack near Presque Ile beach, in Lake Eerie, made national headlines, forcing local authorities to ban swimming in the region for over 14 years until the ban was lifted in 1930.
U.S. Coast Guards reassured local residents that the occurrence of such a predator in the region’s waters “is highly unlikely” as sharks are not well adapted to freshwater systems.
According to authorities more than a hundred people reported missing in the area in the last decade may have fallen under the fangs of the gigantic beast, several local residents even suspecting its presence for a long time.
“It is also possible it traveled to the region through underwater tunnels that interconnect between the Great Lakes,” he told reporters.
Either rising sea temperatures and depleted fish stocks possibly led the shark to adventure itself further into the Great Lakes region.” he admits, visibly puzzled.
Professor of biology at the University of Illinois, Allan Jameson said: “This is not common to find such a beast so far inland.
The great white shark estimated at more than 1.2 tons is the biggest fish ever caught in the region, believe experts.
“I’d heard of the Lake Michigan monster, but never did I expect to catch it myself,” claims the 63-year-old Canadian tourist.
“We reeled in the beast for a good 4-5 hours before my friend Allan finally shot it with a rifle and wounded it to the head” explains O’Keef.
Canadian tourist, John O’Keef and his friend from Chicago, Allan Brooks captured the 3,000-pound beast while fishing for sturgeon in Michigan Lake.



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Days before, his wife had posted a photo of the smiling couple wearing matching Eric Church shirts — Route 91’s headline act.”
“Melton “checked in” at the event on his Facebook page Friday night — and condolences flooded the post’s comments thread Monday.”
“The couple both worked at the Henry County Medical Center in Paris, Tenn. — he was a registered nurse and she is an orthopedic surgeon, the hospital said in a statement.”
“Sonny was the most kind-hearted, loving man I have ever met,” she added in a statement to radio station WCYB.”
“I don’t know what to say.”
““At this point, I’m in complete disbelief and despair.”
““He grabbed me from behind and started running when I felt him get shot in the back.”
““He saved my life,” Heather Gulish Melton told USA Today.”
“Sonny Melton, 29, was fatally gunned down protecting wife Heather from the hail of bullets shooter Stephen Paddock rained down on the Route 91 music festival, his wife said.”
“A nurse from Tennessee died saving his wife’s life in the mass shooting at a Las Vegas music concert Sunday night, according to reports.”


Days before, his wife had posted a photo of the smiling couple wearing matching Eric Church shirts — Route 91’s headline act.
Melton “checked in” at the event on his Facebook page Friday night — and condolences flooded the post’s comments thread Monday.
The couple both worked at the Henry County Medical Center in Paris, Tenn. — he was a registered nurse and she is an orthopedic surgeon, the hospital said in a statement.
Sonny was the most kind-hearted, loving man I have ever met,” she added in a statement to radio station WCYB.
I don’t know what to say.
“At this point, I’m in complete disbelief and despair.
“He grabbed me from behind and started running when I felt him get shot in the back.
“He saved my life,” Heather Gulish Melton told USA Today.
Sonny Melton, 29, was fatally gunned down protecting wife Heather from the hail of bullets shooter Stephen Paddock rained down on the Route 91 music festival, his wife said.
A nurse from Tennessee died saving his wife’s life in the mass shooting at a Las Vegas music concert Sunday night, according to reports.



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...drug for medical use in treatment...”
“A recent 2015 state wide study revealed that more than 60 of adults aged 21 and higher have tried crystal meth at least once and close to 40 of respondents believed crystal meth should be decriminalized as a schedule 2”
“The state of Missouri has led, for more than a decade, the nation in methamphetamine busts.”
““Teeth marks were found on the baby’s arms and legs but luckily he is unharmed” he acknowledged, visibly distraught by the whole affair.”
““Apparently, the baby sitter tried to cook the baby in the microwave oven but she was unable to do so, and was probably disoriented and lost consciousness moments later,” explained Sheriff Deputy Anderson James of the Jefferson County Police Department.”
“The 3-month-old child was found in the microwave, covered in barbecue sauce, and was rushed to Springfield’s Mercy Hospital where doctors do not fear for his life.”
““All I remember is that I started getting really hungry, ate some chicken wings and passed out” recalls the police officer, visibly traumatized by the latest events.”
““I just took a few hits because I was bored and wanted to stay awake,” she told Officer Robert.”
“The 16-year-old babysitter named ‘Anna Ritchie’, claims she had brought some crystal meth and only took a few hits before she became hungry and eventually lost consciousness.”
“Moments later, the parents made the gruesome discovery when the young mother saw something moving in microwave.”


...drug for medical use in treatment...
A recent 2015 state wide study revealed that more than 60 of adults aged 21 and higher have tried crystal meth at least once and close to 40 of respondents believed crystal meth should be decriminalized as a schedule 2
The state of Missouri has led, for more than a decade, the nation in methamphetamine busts.
“Teeth marks were found on the baby’s arms and legs but luckily he is unharmed” he acknowledged, visibly distraught by the whole affair.
“Apparently, the baby sitter tried to cook the baby in the microwave oven but she was unable to do so, and was probably disoriented and lost consciousness moments later,” explained Sheriff Deputy Anderson James of the Jefferson County Police Department.
The 3-month-old child was found in the microwave, covered in barbecue sauce, and was rushed to Springfield’s Mercy Hospital where doctors do not fear for his life.
“All I remember is that I started getting really hungry, ate some chicken wings and passed out” recalls the police officer, visibly traumatized by the latest events.
“I just took a few hits because I was bored and wanted to stay awake,” she told Officer Robert.
The 16-year-old babysitter named ‘Anna Ritchie’, claims she had brought some crystal meth and only took a few hits before she became hungry and eventually lost consciousness.
Moments later, the parents made the gruesome discovery when the young mother saw something moving in microwave.



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We rate this story Pants on Fire.”
“Such hoaxes that Delta or other airlines, including Southwest Airlines, have been giving away free tickets have circulated for years.”
“"Congratulations!”
“You have been selected to take part in our short survey to get 2 Free Delta Airline Tickets!”
“We only have 332 Tickets remaining so hurry up!"”
“...states the website Delta-Flying.info.”
“After we started our fact-check, the link was no longer in use and had been flagged as suspected phishing.”
“It is not an official Delta website.”
“Don’t take the surveys — these are all scams.”
“The story that said Delta Airlines offers free airline tickets for people who take a short survey is a scam.”


We rate this story Pants on Fire.
Such hoaxes that Delta or other airlines, including Southwest Airlines, have been giving away free tickets have circulated for years.
"Congratulations!
You have been selected to take part in our short survey to get 2 Free Delta Airline Tickets!
We only have 332 Tickets remaining so hurry up!"
...states the website Delta-Flying.info.
After we started our fact-check, the link was no longer in use and had been flagged as suspected phishing.
It is not an official Delta website.
Don’t take the surveys — these are all scams.
The story that said Delta Airlines offers free airline tickets for people who take a short survey is a scam.



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The young man could possibly be accused of criminal negligence causing death.”
“Investigators have not ruled out the possibility of filing criminal charges against the employee who caused his death.”
“The police have opened an investigation to determine the exact circumstances surrounding Mr. Johnson’s death.”
“...the right body...”
“We shut down the heating system but he was already dead Ms Davis claims that the young coworker who caused the accident was a new employee and had forgotten to check for the toe tag to make sure he had...”
“When we realised what was happening, it was too late.”
““At first, we didn’t understand where the sound was coming from.”
“Jenna Davis, one of Henri Johnson’s coworkers, says she heard him scream for about 15 seconds after the crematory was activated.”
“Before anyone could notice the mistake, he had already been exposed to temperatures ranging between 1400 to 1800 degrees Fahrenheit and reduced to ashes.”
“While he was sleeping, another employee mistook him for the corpse of a 52-year-old car accident victim and carried him to the crematory.”


The young man could possibly be accused of criminal negligence causing death.
Investigators have not ruled out the possibility of filing criminal charges against the employee who caused his death.
The police have opened an investigation to determine the exact circumstances surrounding Mr. Johnson’s death.
...the right body...
We shut down the heating system but he was already dead Ms Davis claims that the young coworker who caused the accident was a new employee and had forgotten to check for the toe tag to make sure he had...
When we realised what was happening, it was too late.
“At first, we didn’t understand where the sound was coming from.
Jenna Davis, one of Henri Johnson’s coworkers, says she heard him scream for about 15 seconds after the crematory was activated.
Before anyone could notice the mistake, he had already been exposed to temperatures ranging between 1400 to 1800 degrees Fahrenheit and reduced to ashes.
While he was sleeping, another employee mistook him for the corpse of a 52-year-old car accident victim and carried him to the crematory.



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...source:politicops.comCommentscomments...”
“It s so obvious I honestly find it hilarious But once the interviewer persisted in the search for a direct answer Bannon said Alright look that s the thing about marriage right you get to do all the things you re not supposed to in a relationship that s the...”
“According to Politico, Breitbart News chairman Stephen Bannon was charged with battery, dissuading a witness, and misdemeanor domestic violence in connection with a January 1996 incident in the couple’s southern California home.”
““I was wondering when this would come up,” Bannon told Politico.”
“It s been a while and given my current position at the head of Donald Trump s campaign I was curious to see how long it would take the Democrats to start digging around my past and try to find enough filth and misinformation to use as ammunition to bring...”
“...me down...”
“And while we’re on the subject, I’m actually disappointed; I honestly didn’t expect them to take this long,” he said laughingly.”
“Asked to comment on the validity of the charges against him, Bannon first attempted to circle around a direct answer to the question and said, “Well, look, you know things like these are orchestrated, right?”
“I mean, no one in their right mind would be looking to shoot down people that aren’t targeting them in the first place.”
“And the fact that this is happening right now, like, 20 years later, I mean, it’s just ridiculous.”


...source:politicops.comCommentscomments...
It s so obvious I honestly find it hilarious But once the interviewer persisted in the search for a direct answer Bannon said Alright look that s the thing about marriage right you get to do all the things you re not supposed to in a relationship that s the...
According to Politico, Breitbart News chairman Stephen Bannon was charged with battery, dissuading a witness, and misdemeanor domestic violence in connection with a January 1996 incident in the couple’s southern California home.
“I was wondering when this would come up,” Bannon told Politico.
It s been a while and given my current position at the head of Donald Trump s campaign I was curious to see how long it would take the Democrats to start digging around my past and try to find enough filth and misinformation to use as ammunition to bring...
...me down...
And while we’re on the subject, I’m actually disappointed; I honestly didn’t expect them to take this long,” he said laughingly.
Asked to comment on the validity of the charges against him, Bannon first attempted to circle around a direct answer to the question and said, “Well, look, you know things like these are orchestrated, right?
I mean, no one in their right mind would be looking to shoot down people that aren’t targeting them in the first place.
And the fact that this is happening right now, like, 20 years later, I mean, it’s just ridiculous.



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ADADBut he has also targeted his classmates on the conservative media circuit.”
“Kashuv has echoed critics on the right that a focus on law-enforcement failures, not gun laws, is the way forward.”
“They are too naive and young to grasp the extent of how money, politics and policy intersect, the argument goes.”
“ADADGenerally, one form of criticism of González and fellow students such as David Hogg, 17, has focused on their ages.”
“Moynihan’s tweet keyed on an idea: Public moments by the Parkland students are being scrutinized and stretched to either bolster or tear down arguments on social media, built on the traditional debates made around the dinner table.”
“...and whose account has since been suspended...”
“Donald Moynihan a professor at the University of Wisconsin at Madison debunked the altered image saying in a tweet Just a sample of what NRA supporters are doing to teenagers who survived a massacre real picture on the right referencing a user named Linda NRA Supporter who posted the photo...”
“The pushback seems to have gained more traction than the original images, although that means the original images are also spread wider.”
“The still images, looking more sophisticated than the glitchy animation, went further, appearing to be taken as legitimate by some conservative-minded Twitter users.”
“ADADGab, the Twitter-like social network that is a popular refuge for the alt-right, tweeted the animation on Saturday to more than 100,000 followers, then hours later asserted it was “satire.” It racked up more than 1,200 retweets.”


ADADBut he has also targeted his classmates on the conservative media circuit.
Kashuv has echoed critics on the right that a focus on law-enforcement failures, not gun laws, is the way forward.
They are too naive and young to grasp the extent of how money, politics and policy intersect, the argument goes.
ADADGenerally, one form of criticism of González and fellow students such as David Hogg, 17, has focused on their ages.
Moynihan’s tweet keyed on an idea: Public moments by the Parkland students are being scrutinized and stretched to either bolster or tear down arguments on social media, built on the traditional debates made around the dinner table.
...and whose account has since been suspended...
Donald Moynihan a professor at the University of Wisconsin at Madison debunked the altered image saying in a tweet Just a sample of what NRA supporters are doing to teenagers who survived a massacre real picture on the right referencing a user named Linda NRA Supporter who posted the photo...
The pushback seems to have gained more traction than the original images, although that means the original images are also spread wider.
The still images, looking more sophisticated than the glitchy animation, went further, appearing to be taken as legitimate by some conservative-minded Twitter users.
ADADGab, the Twitter-like social network that is a popular refuge for the alt-right, tweeted the animation on Saturday to more than 100,000 followers, then hours later asserted it was “satire.” It racked up more than 1,200 retweets.



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The above-mentioned events are really worth witnessing if you really consider yourself a true fan of your favorite stars.”
“Though some of these artists may be known for their special kind of songs, they are actually rooted in all forms of music, and that is the reason you never get bored while listening to them continuously.”
“One out of them is, the very famous, San Antonio.”
“There are many such events to be held in the future.”
“And the biggest is — Monster Jam Seattle.”
“Don’t miss it and also, hurry up to buy Hamilton Chicago tickets.”
“In these articles, we will discuss some points on the concerts in San Antonio.”
“A large number of upcoming eventsIf you want to book the ticket, you should go right now.”
“Tickets are flying and the reason behind this is, there is a large number of upcoming events in the near future.”
“Some are far, but some are very close to happening, and nobody knows when the counter will say ‘Sold Out’.”


The above-mentioned events are really worth witnessing if you really consider yourself a true fan of your favorite stars.
Though some of these artists may be known for their special kind of songs, they are actually rooted in all forms of music, and that is the reason you never get bored while listening to them continuously.
One out of them is, the very famous, San Antonio.
There are many such events to be held in the future.
And the biggest is — Monster Jam Seattle.
Don’t miss it and also, hurry up to buy Hamilton Chicago tickets.
In these articles, we will discuss some points on the concerts in San Antonio.
A large number of upcoming eventsIf you want to book the ticket, you should go right now.
Tickets are flying and the reason behind this is, there is a large number of upcoming events in the near future.
Some are far, but some are very close to happening, and nobody knows when the counter will say ‘Sold Out’.



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The GOP presidential hopeful is scheduled to address California’s Republican convention on Friday.”
“...off the start of his California campaign on Thursday where he made a stop in Costa Mesa a semi rural farming community located in Orange County...”
“– GOP presidential front-runner and billionaire entrepreneur Donald Trump on Thursday unveiled his plan to ‘make the military great again,’ saying he intends to reinstate the draft as part of a larger effort to bolster America’s armed forces.”
““We’re bringing back the draft, okay?”
“We’re going to bring it back and were going to make America as strong as we were in the Sixties,” Trump declared while addressing supporters at the Pacific Amphitheater in Costa Mesa.”
““I love the Sixties,” said Trump, continuing, “I was a very big supporter of the Vietnam war and, of course, the troops.”
“No one supports the troops more than I do In addition to bringing back military conscription Mr Trump said that if elected he will enact legislation that will guarantee citizenship to anyone who serves in the armed forces for a...”
“...minimum of four years...”
““You have people coming into this country, coming over our borders, expecting a free ride.”
“We’re not going to give it to them, folks.”


The GOP presidential hopeful is scheduled to address California’s Republican convention on Friday.
...off the start of his California campaign on Thursday where he made a stop in Costa Mesa a semi rural farming community located in Orange County...
– GOP presidential front-runner and billionaire entrepreneur Donald Trump on Thursday unveiled his plan to ‘make the military great again,’ saying he intends to reinstate the draft as part of a larger effort to bolster America’s armed forces.
“We’re bringing back the draft, okay?
We’re going to bring it back and were going to make America as strong as we were in the Sixties,” Trump declared while addressing supporters at the Pacific Amphitheater in Costa Mesa.
“I love the Sixties,” said Trump, continuing, “I was a very big supporter of the Vietnam war and, of course, the troops.
No one supports the troops more than I do In addition to bringing back military conscription Mr Trump said that if elected he will enact legislation that will guarantee citizenship to anyone who serves in the armed forces for a...
...minimum of four years...
“You have people coming into this country, coming over our borders, expecting a free ride.
We’re not going to give it to them, folks.



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Perhaps, before the UN lectures America and other nations for recognizing the rights of their citizens to keep and bear arms, it should look at its own failures to stop the ‘illicit firearms trade.’”
“Perhaps it’s time that Donald Trump remove the United States from the United Nations, an organization that does little more than take money from America and hands it to corrupt nations via poorly-run bureaucracies.”
“Many think they are hoping that the United States will help it to track (and likely, confiscate) firearms in the country.”
“According to some, the United Nations, an extremely corrupt international government organization with a long track record of failure and few (if any) successes to its name.”
“It appears that the agreement could also include ‘stockpiles’ owned by American citizens.”
“Apparently, American ‘representatives’ at the conference agreed to begin developing ‘legal frameworks’ (generally, laws and regulations) that will enforce “proper management” of “small arms and light weapons” stockpiles.”
“The Third Review Conference for the UN’s Programme of Action on Small Arms and Light Weapons concluded at the end of June.”
“'”However, the wording here is suspicious.”
“'”“‘Any measures enacted by the UN program would not infringe on Second or Tenth Amendment rights because they are inherently focused on illicit trade — not the legal trade within American borders that those amendments provide the basis for.”
“‘The trade being targeted in particular is dispersion/diversion — especially across borders — that fuels black markets and conflict in unstable regions.”


Perhaps, before the UN lectures America and other nations for recognizing the rights of their citizens to keep and bear arms, it should look at its own failures to stop the ‘illicit firearms trade.’
Perhaps it’s time that Donald Trump remove the United States from the United Nations, an organization that does little more than take money from America and hands it to corrupt nations via poorly-run bureaucracies.
Many think they are hoping that the United States will help it to track (and likely, confiscate) firearms in the country.
According to some, the United Nations, an extremely corrupt international government organization with a long track record of failure and few (if any) successes to its name.
It appears that the agreement could also include ‘stockpiles’ owned by American citizens.
Apparently, American ‘representatives’ at the conference agreed to begin developing ‘legal frameworks’ (generally, laws and regulations) that will enforce “proper management” of “small arms and light weapons” stockpiles.
The Third Review Conference for the UN’s Programme of Action on Small Arms and Light Weapons concluded at the end of June.
'”However, the wording here is suspicious.
'”“‘Any measures enacted by the UN program would not infringe on Second or Tenth Amendment rights because they are inherently focused on illicit trade — not the legal trade within American borders that those amendments provide the basis for.
‘The trade being targeted in particular is dispersion/diversion — especially across borders — that fuels black markets and conflict in unstable regions.



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ask Hillary Clinton publicly, during your next debate for an audit of all of the money they have stolen from Haiti.”Go to the 5 minute mark of the video to see Sansaricq’s comments to candidate Trump:Like this: Like Loading...”
“We welcome you sir and we will work with you.”
“For years the Haitians have been struggling and protesting outside the Clinton Foundation offices over the robbery.”
“The money taken was donated by the individuals and business directly to the Clinton Foundation, thinking they were going to receive aid.”
“However, the opposite it true.”
“The money never even made it to the poorest of the poor.”
“Now we have one man ready to testify against the corrupt Clinton Foundation in the upcoming week.”
“However, the 50 year old man, a former Haitian government official Klaus Eberwein, was found dead in his Miami home with a “gunshot to the head” that’s been ruled a “suicide” by the Miami-Dade’s medical examiner records supervisor.”
“Klaus Eberwein, a former Haitian government official who was expected to expose the extent of Clinton Foundation corruption and malpractice next week, has been found dead in Miami.”
“He was 50.”


Ask Hillary Clinton publicly, during your next debate for an audit of all of the money they have stolen from Haiti.”Go to the 5 minute mark of the video to see Sansaricq’s comments to candidate Trump:Like this: Like Loading...
We welcome you sir and we will work with you.
For years the Haitians have been struggling and protesting outside the Clinton Foundation offices over the robbery.
The money taken was donated by the individuals and business directly to the Clinton Foundation, thinking they were going to receive aid.
However, the opposite it true.
The money never even made it to the poorest of the poor.
Now we have one man ready to testify against the corrupt Clinton Foundation in the upcoming week.
However, the 50 year old man, a former Haitian government official Klaus Eberwein, was found dead in his Miami home with a “gunshot to the head” that’s been ruled a “suicide” by the Miami-Dade’s medical examiner records supervisor.
Klaus Eberwein, a former Haitian government official who was expected to expose the extent of Clinton Foundation corruption and malpractice next week, has been found dead in Miami.
He was 50.



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Facebook is picking sides.”
“...pic.twitter.com/KHy5Qfykg6 — Gab: Free Speech Social Network (@getongab) December 8, 2017So Facebook shut down the story on Judge Roy Moore’s accuser.”
“Facebook is TRASH.”
“Breitbart wrote a similar post and it was also blocked by Facebook.”
“No one will be able to see our story on Facebook.”
“The far left website Politifact said our story was not accurate and Facebook the shut it down.”
“But after we posted the story this morning Facebook shut down our story.”
“The yearbook signature has been discredited as reported by ABC’s GMA this morning.”
“The statements were made by Beverly Nelson this morning.”
“TRENDING: FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr. Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn -- FBI Singled Her OutThe story is solid.”


Facebook is picking sides.
...pic.twitter.com/KHy5Qfykg6 — Gab: Free Speech Social Network (@getongab) December 8, 2017So Facebook shut down the story on Judge Roy Moore’s accuser.
Facebook is TRASH.
Breitbart wrote a similar post and it was also blocked by Facebook.
No one will be able to see our story on Facebook.
The far left website Politifact said our story was not accurate and Facebook the shut it down.
But after we posted the story this morning Facebook shut down our story.
The yearbook signature has been discredited as reported by ABC’s GMA this morning.
The statements were made by Beverly Nelson this morning.
TRENDING: FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr. Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn -- FBI Singled Her OutThe story is solid.



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As other non-major-party candidates have promised to do, De La Fuente has mounted several legal challenges for ballot access.”
“Roque “Rocky” De La Fuente is running as an independent and is on the ballot in 20 states.”
“Castle says this would likely require hiring professionals who often charge a few dollars for each signature.”
“To be on the ballot there required signatures from at least 3 percent of all votes cast in the state in 2012, or about 40,000 signatures.”
“Castle isn’t on the ballot in Oklahoma.”
““Those states are virtually impossible for a party like mine because they cost so much money,” Castle said.”
“Castle said his campaign has faced ballot access obstacles in California, Texas and Oklahoma.”
“Darrell Castle, the candidate for the Constitution Party, is on the ballot in more than two dozen states.”
“Getting ballot access can be hard for smaller campaigns with fewer resources.”


As other non-major-party candidates have promised to do, De La Fuente has mounted several legal challenges for ballot access.
Roque “Rocky” De La Fuente is running as an independent and is on the ballot in 20 states.
Castle says this would likely require hiring professionals who often charge a few dollars for each signature.
To be on the ballot there required signatures from at least 3 percent of all votes cast in the state in 2012, or about 40,000 signatures.
Castle isn’t on the ballot in Oklahoma.
“Those states are virtually impossible for a party like mine because they cost so much money,” Castle said.
Castle said his campaign has faced ballot access obstacles in California, Texas and Oklahoma.
Darrell Castle, the candidate for the Constitution Party, is on the ballot in more than two dozen states.
Getting ballot access can be hard for smaller campaigns with fewer resources.



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share this on Facebook or Twitter SCROLL DOWN FOR MORE”
“Don’t slow down.”
“Jason Chaffetz, the Chairman of the United States House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, informed the committee that he had a meeting with President Trump who gave him permission to investigate whatever he wants.”
“Chaffetz also hinted that charges against Hillary could be happening soon.”
“Here is what Chaffetz said:“President Trump visited Philadelphia when we were at our planning and strategy session.”
“I went backstage with the President.”
“Here’s what he said: ‘You do a great job.”
“Listen, I understand I’m the president and you have a job.”
“You do the oversight.”
“Go after everything you want to go after.”


Share this on Facebook or Twitter SCROLL DOWN FOR MORE
Don’t slow down.
Jason Chaffetz, the Chairman of the United States House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, informed the committee that he had a meeting with President Trump who gave him permission to investigate whatever he wants.
Chaffetz also hinted that charges against Hillary could be happening soon.
Here is what Chaffetz said:“President Trump visited Philadelphia when we were at our planning and strategy session.
I went backstage with the President.
Here’s what he said: ‘You do a great job.
Listen, I understand I’m the president and you have a job.
You do the oversight.
Go after everything you want to go after.



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned!”
“The staff at Freedom Crossroads is working diligently around the clock to bring you more details about the newest salacious tryst.”
“Pathetic.”
“And now we all know the REAL reason that the sad ex-FBI Director Comey is trying to attack Donald Trump… to impress his GIRLFRIEND!”
“Not exactly shocking, considering they’re two liberal sickos — and we all know, ANYTHING goes for them.”
“According to our exclusive sources, Comey and Wasserman Schultz met while both working for the government, and despite the fact that both of them are married, they couldn’t put aside their lust for each other and decided to have an affair.”
“These two dimwits were probably attracted to each other because they are both LOSERS who can’t accept defeat, but that doesn’t really differentiate them from the rest of the crybaby Democrat Party, now does it?”
“...in Heave errrrr Hell...”
“As we promised Freedom Crossroads has just learned the identity of the Democrat James Comey has been having an affair with for at LEAST the last 8 months it s none other than the DISGRACED former Chair of the DNC Debbie Whiny Democrat Wasserman Schultz talk about a match made...”


Stay tuned!
The staff at Freedom Crossroads is working diligently around the clock to bring you more details about the newest salacious tryst.
Pathetic.
And now we all know the REAL reason that the sad ex-FBI Director Comey is trying to attack Donald Trump… to impress his GIRLFRIEND!
Not exactly shocking, considering they’re two liberal sickos — and we all know, ANYTHING goes for them.
According to our exclusive sources, Comey and Wasserman Schultz met while both working for the government, and despite the fact that both of them are married, they couldn’t put aside their lust for each other and decided to have an affair.
These two dimwits were probably attracted to each other because they are both LOSERS who can’t accept defeat, but that doesn’t really differentiate them from the rest of the crybaby Democrat Party, now does it?
...in Heave errrrr Hell...
As we promised Freedom Crossroads has just learned the identity of the Democrat James Comey has been having an affair with for at LEAST the last 8 months it s none other than the DISGRACED former Chair of the DNC Debbie Whiny Democrat Wasserman Schultz talk about a match made...



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...photo by Gage Skidmore / CC BY-SA 3.0 / cropped & photo by Gage Skidmore / CC BY-SA 3.0 / cropped...”
“Rosenberg is a great place to find the hundreds of extras for our alien population and we re very excited about filming here Let us know what you think about this exciting news in the comments section below...”
“Local fans of the film series were understandably excited about the news and especially excited about the prospect of becoming an extra in the film after producers made this short statement released to the press earlier today We think that...”
“A casting call for extras will be announced well before that time period, however.”
“No details were released as to exactly when production would take place in the Rosenberg area but they stated that it should begin no later than this fall.”
“The undisclosed location near Rosenberg will represent a previously unknown planet in the Star Wars universe.”
“ROSENBERG, Texas – Reports out of Hollywood this morning are confirming that a portion of the next Star Wars movie will be filmed near Rosenberg, Texas.”


...photo by Gage Skidmore / CC BY-SA 3.0 / cropped & photo by Gage Skidmore / CC BY-SA 3.0 / cropped...
Rosenberg is a great place to find the hundreds of extras for our alien population and we re very excited about filming here Let us know what you think about this exciting news in the comments section below...
Local fans of the film series were understandably excited about the news and especially excited about the prospect of becoming an extra in the film after producers made this short statement released to the press earlier today We think that...
A casting call for extras will be announced well before that time period, however.
No details were released as to exactly when production would take place in the Rosenberg area but they stated that it should begin no later than this fall.
The undisclosed location near Rosenberg will represent a previously unknown planet in the Star Wars universe.
ROSENBERG, Texas – Reports out of Hollywood this morning are confirming that a portion of the next Star Wars movie will be filmed near Rosenberg, Texas.



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I can’t believe I was friends with this guy and I literally would stay the night at his place when we were kids,” the former friend wrote.”
““It’s scary to know this psychopath has been in my house.”
“Another former pal described the sinking feeling he got from knowing he used to be buddies with Kelley, who on Sunday opened fire inside a Texas church, killing 26 people, including children and a pregnant woman, and injuring 20 more.”
““He was being super nagtive [sic] all the timd [sic].”Oddly, Kelley lists teaching vacation Bible school as volunteer experience on his LinkedIn page, and his wife, Danielle Shields, was previously a teacher at a Baptist church, according to the Mail.”
““I legit just deleted him off my fb cause I couldn’t stand his post.”“I removed him off FB for those same reasons!” replied Christopher Leo Longoria.”
““He was always talking about how people who believe in God we’re stupid and trying to preach his atheism,” wrote former classmate Nina Rose Nava in a Facebook post, according to the Daily Mail.”
“Texas church shooter Devin Kelley was a “creepy” atheist “outcast” who never fit in and berated religious believers on social media, according to former friends and classmates.”


I can’t believe I was friends with this guy and I literally would stay the night at his place when we were kids,” the former friend wrote.
“It’s scary to know this psychopath has been in my house.
Another former pal described the sinking feeling he got from knowing he used to be buddies with Kelley, who on Sunday opened fire inside a Texas church, killing 26 people, including children and a pregnant woman, and injuring 20 more.
“He was being super nagtive [sic] all the timd [sic].”Oddly, Kelley lists teaching vacation Bible school as volunteer experience on his LinkedIn page, and his wife, Danielle Shields, was previously a teacher at a Baptist church, according to the Mail.
“I legit just deleted him off my fb cause I couldn’t stand his post.”“I removed him off FB for those same reasons!” replied Christopher Leo Longoria.
“He was always talking about how people who believe in God we’re stupid and trying to preach his atheism,” wrote former classmate Nina Rose Nava in a Facebook post, according to the Daily Mail.
Texas church shooter Devin Kelley was a “creepy” atheist “outcast” who never fit in and berated religious believers on social media, according to former friends and classmates.



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Speaker…You’re fired.”And that, as they say, is that.”
“He walked right over to the Speaker, refused to shake his hand and instead put a finger in his face and said:“Mr.”
“According to a statement released by Jeff Derpinger at the WHOIP:President Trump will no longer protect, defend or endorse anything the soon-to-be-former Speaker does, says or campaigns on.”
“The betrayal of Paul Ryan and his subsequent dismissal as an advisor to the president and his upsoming loss in the election in 2018 is his own fault.”
“Let this be a lesson to the rest of Congress: Donald Trump is your chief executive.”
“He deserves your support and respect.”
“Anything other than that will result in your removal from office by campaigning against you and in the best interest of the American people.”
“Only President Trump knows what it takes to win.”
“Fall in line or pack your bags.”
“Ryan s office has asserted that he can not be fired by President Trump but has also expressed remorse for the events that led up to the secret tape recently released by Breitbart Speaker Ryan was just as shocked as the rest of the world at Donald Trump s statement...”


Speaker…You’re fired.”And that, as they say, is that.
He walked right over to the Speaker, refused to shake his hand and instead put a finger in his face and said:“Mr.
According to a statement released by Jeff Derpinger at the WHOIP:President Trump will no longer protect, defend or endorse anything the soon-to-be-former Speaker does, says or campaigns on.
The betrayal of Paul Ryan and his subsequent dismissal as an advisor to the president and his upsoming loss in the election in 2018 is his own fault.
Let this be a lesson to the rest of Congress: Donald Trump is your chief executive.
He deserves your support and respect.
Anything other than that will result in your removal from office by campaigning against you and in the best interest of the American people.
Only President Trump knows what it takes to win.
Fall in line or pack your bags.
Ryan s office has asserted that he can not be fired by President Trump but has also expressed remorse for the events that led up to the secret tape recently released by Breitbart Speaker Ryan was just as shocked as the rest of the world at Donald Trump s statement...



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Asked about their concerns, Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell said he “doesn’t care” and plans to “completely ignore” the Democrats in the nomination process since “there’s nothing they can do” and he is “literally unstoppable.””
“Booker then called a ten-minute recess for him to refresh his supply of fake tears before he could continue.”
“...for the cameras but failing...”
“Not people who will bow to the whims of the Constitution pitting its extremist values of freedom of speech and freedom of religion against our agenda We re sick and tired of the Constitution sitting in the National Archives manipulating everything we do stated Senator Cory Booker trying to emote...”
““We need judges to be advocates of progressive laws,” Senator Elizabeth Warren added.”
“And it’s time for that to end.”Senate Democrats have vowed to make sure that any new nominee isn’t going to be beholden to outside influences like the Constitution, the founding fathers, or the rule of law.”
“These right-wing judges don’t think for themselves, they just do whatever the Constitution says.”
““And it’s always — always — the ones the Constitution is against.”
““Time and time again, we find progressive laws getting struck down,” Senate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer said in a Senate address.”
“Constitution Senate Democrats announced Friday...”


Asked about their concerns, Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell said he “doesn’t care” and plans to “completely ignore” the Democrats in the nomination process since “there’s nothing they can do” and he is “literally unstoppable.”
Booker then called a ten-minute recess for him to refresh his supply of fake tears before he could continue.
...for the cameras but failing...
Not people who will bow to the whims of the Constitution pitting its extremist values of freedom of speech and freedom of religion against our agenda We re sick and tired of the Constitution sitting in the National Archives manipulating everything we do stated Senator Cory Booker trying to emote...
“We need judges to be advocates of progressive laws,” Senator Elizabeth Warren added.
And it’s time for that to end.”Senate Democrats have vowed to make sure that any new nominee isn’t going to be beholden to outside influences like the Constitution, the founding fathers, or the rule of law.
These right-wing judges don’t think for themselves, they just do whatever the Constitution says.
“And it’s always — always — the ones the Constitution is against.
“Time and time again, we find progressive laws getting struck down,” Senate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer said in a Senate address.
Constitution Senate Democrats announced Friday...



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They can never just admit when they lost.”
“...time and money with a fruitless recount...”
“The Secretary of State s office has already announced that the election won t be certified until after the first of the year so the Democrat loser will have plenty of time to decide if he ll waste the taxpayers...”
“That could be a costly effort, estimated at nearly $213 million.”
“...himself...”
“Warmest regards Bethany Marie Palmaranian What that means for the Jones campaign is that it will now be on them to ask for a recount and since the margin is more than 01573 he ll have to pay for it...”
“Please feel free to inquire about the final 3 percent, which is fewer than 400 votes and can’t possibly change the outcome at this point.”
“Electoral Balloting Integrity to inform you that with 97 percent of that vote counted Justice Roy Moore now leads the race by 5014 votes...”
“RWR obtained a copy of the email sent to Breitbart confirming that Roy Moore is in the lead Dear Ferdinand In response to your question on the final count of provisional military ballots the Secretary has instructed the Division of...”
“The Alabama Secretary of State’s Division Of Electoral Balloting Integrity has begun sending emails to media outlets regarding the military vote count in the Roy Moore vs. Doug Jones Senatorial race.”


They can never just admit when they lost.
...time and money with a fruitless recount...
The Secretary of State s office has already announced that the election won t be certified until after the first of the year so the Democrat loser will have plenty of time to decide if he ll waste the taxpayers...
That could be a costly effort, estimated at nearly $213 million.
...himself...
Warmest regards Bethany Marie Palmaranian What that means for the Jones campaign is that it will now be on them to ask for a recount and since the margin is more than 01573 he ll have to pay for it...
Please feel free to inquire about the final 3 percent, which is fewer than 400 votes and can’t possibly change the outcome at this point.
Electoral Balloting Integrity to inform you that with 97 percent of that vote counted Justice Roy Moore now leads the race by 5014 votes...
RWR obtained a copy of the email sent to Breitbart confirming that Roy Moore is in the lead Dear Ferdinand In response to your question on the final count of provisional military ballots the Secretary has instructed the Division of...
The Alabama Secretary of State’s Division Of Electoral Balloting Integrity has begun sending emails to media outlets regarding the military vote count in the Roy Moore vs. Doug Jones Senatorial race.



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Those men were about to be unleashed on the public for $40K each.”
“After running the men through facial recognition, they found more than a dozen suspected terrorists who are on the US no-fly list.”
“...vetting process...”
“We interviewed those who spoke English and were told that for 40K anyone can catch a ride to the United States on a ship nobody would ever suspect Immigration was immediately called and found that of the 460 people on board illegally not one had been through any kind of...”
“They were all Refugees from places like Yemen and Syria and not a single one had any kind of documentation.”
“Yes, people.”
“In the middle of the ship’s large manifest of containers, most of which were empty, we found 14 containing…people.”
“We honestly didn’t know what to expect, but what we found was simply…surreal.”
“BPA Harbormaster Jake Cummings explained to CNN:“We received a tip that the Clinton Foundation flagship, The Chelsea, was carrying illegal contraband into the United States.”
“The ship, which was supposed to be carrying “emergency supplies,” was actually carrying a cargo that had authorities stunned.”


Those men were about to be unleashed on the public for $40K each.
After running the men through facial recognition, they found more than a dozen suspected terrorists who are on the US no-fly list.
...vetting process...
We interviewed those who spoke English and were told that for 40K anyone can catch a ride to the United States on a ship nobody would ever suspect Immigration was immediately called and found that of the 460 people on board illegally not one had been through any kind of...
They were all Refugees from places like Yemen and Syria and not a single one had any kind of documentation.
Yes, people.
In the middle of the ship’s large manifest of containers, most of which were empty, we found 14 containing…people.
We honestly didn’t know what to expect, but what we found was simply…surreal.
BPA Harbormaster Jake Cummings explained to CNN:“We received a tip that the Clinton Foundation flagship, The Chelsea, was carrying illegal contraband into the United States.
The ship, which was supposed to be carrying “emergency supplies,” was actually carrying a cargo that had authorities stunned.



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He wants to be on TV and he wants everyone to thinks he’s important.””
“He’s just some egotistical, silly person whose main concern in life is getting a blowjob.”
“I don’t think he wants to be president, and I don’t think he has a chance to be the president.”
“I just think that he’s a silly reality-show bozo and blustering guy who likes getting attention.”
“Cyrus isn’t the only artist to lament a possible future with Trump as commander in chief: Red Hot Chili Peppers’ Flea recently told Rolling Stone, “I can’t take Donald Trump or anything he says seriously.”
“Trump...”
“...aintapartyindausaanymo A photo posted by Miley Cyrus mileycyrus on Mar 1 2016 at 6 32pm PST Cyrus Instagram then took aim at self proclaimed most hated woman in the world Rebecca Francis a woman who uses her social media to showcase her hunting prowess and the hunter s allegiance to...”
“A photo posted by Miley Cyrus (@mileycyrus) on Feb 29, 2016 at 12:35pm PSTgonna vom / move out da country.”
“Donald Trump is a fucking nightmare!”
“On Wednesday, the Dead Petz singer continued lobbying against the GOP frontrunner with a photo of Trump’s delegate totals over Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio and a caption where Cyrus playfully threatened to move out of the country if Trump is elected and a hashtag #aintapartyindausaanymo.”


He wants to be on TV and he wants everyone to thinks he’s important.”
He’s just some egotistical, silly person whose main concern in life is getting a blowjob.
I don’t think he wants to be president, and I don’t think he has a chance to be the president.
I just think that he’s a silly reality-show bozo and blustering guy who likes getting attention.
Cyrus isn’t the only artist to lament a possible future with Trump as commander in chief: Red Hot Chili Peppers’ Flea recently told Rolling Stone, “I can’t take Donald Trump or anything he says seriously.
Trump...
...aintapartyindausaanymo A photo posted by Miley Cyrus mileycyrus on Mar 1 2016 at 6 32pm PST Cyrus Instagram then took aim at self proclaimed most hated woman in the world Rebecca Francis a woman who uses her social media to showcase her hunting prowess and the hunter s allegiance to...
A photo posted by Miley Cyrus (@mileycyrus) on Feb 29, 2016 at 12:35pm PSTgonna vom / move out da country.
Donald Trump is a fucking nightmare!
On Wednesday, the Dead Petz singer continued lobbying against the GOP frontrunner with a photo of Trump’s delegate totals over Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio and a caption where Cyrus playfully threatened to move out of the country if Trump is elected and a hashtag #aintapartyindausaanymo.



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s nice to know there are still places like this in America.”photo by David Shankbone / CC BY 2.0 / cropped...”
“So yeah, that’s my story about Rochester.”
“Murray added later, “You have to understand, this is something that would’ve never happened in L.A.!”
“I’m gonna move there after I retire, ” Murray said with a laugh.”
“I’m telling you, these people in Rochester are the real deal.”
“These guys had no idea who I was either which made my day, honestly.”
“Great freakin’ burger too.”
“...the finest dining spot in Rochester some place called Wild Willy s and get a burger...”
“So then the one guy finds out that I m not from there and offers to take me in to get lunch while my car is getting fixed and I m thinking Sure what the hell So we drove to...”
“...place nearby to get fixed...”


It’s nice to know there are still places like this in America.”photo by David Shankbone / CC BY 2.0 / cropped...
So yeah, that’s my story about Rochester.
Murray added later, “You have to understand, this is something that would’ve never happened in L.A.!
I’m gonna move there after I retire, ” Murray said with a laugh.
I’m telling you, these people in Rochester are the real deal.
These guys had no idea who I was either which made my day, honestly.
Great freakin’ burger too.
...the finest dining spot in Rochester some place called Wild Willy s and get a burger...
So then the one guy finds out that I m not from there and offers to take me in to get lunch while my car is getting fixed and I m thinking Sure what the hell So we drove to...
...place nearby to get fixed...



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source:the-postillon.com...”
“India is to pay for their flights.”
“I had to act.”Further criticism is to be found on the President’s Twitter account:He also tweeted:The White House has announced that Indians will be given a three month period in which to leave the country.”
““That means they are here illegally.”
“You can’t trust these Indians.”President Trump consulted with the appropriate members of the government and found that most Indians do not possess the relevant immigration documents.”
“Horrible attacks on good Americans using hatchets or bows and arrows.”
“He claimed, “I’ve seen it in all kinds of TV documentaries.”
“In an interview with Fox News, President Trump described Indians living in the USA as lawless warriors with a history of attacking and killing US citizens.”
“He is to sign an executive order to this effect this week.”
“Washington (dpo) – As part of his plan to improve national security and combat illegal immigration, US President Donald Trump intends to send around 3 million American Indians back to where they came from – India.”


Source:the-postillon.com...
India is to pay for their flights.
I had to act.”Further criticism is to be found on the President’s Twitter account:He also tweeted:The White House has announced that Indians will be given a three month period in which to leave the country.
“That means they are here illegally.
You can’t trust these Indians.”President Trump consulted with the appropriate members of the government and found that most Indians do not possess the relevant immigration documents.
Horrible attacks on good Americans using hatchets or bows and arrows.
He claimed, “I’ve seen it in all kinds of TV documentaries.
In an interview with Fox News, President Trump described Indians living in the USA as lawless warriors with a history of attacking and killing US citizens.
He is to sign an executive order to this effect this week.
Washington (dpo) – As part of his plan to improve national security and combat illegal immigration, US President Donald Trump intends to send around 3 million American Indians back to where they came from – India.



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The inspector general referred him, Page, and three other people to the FBI office that handles disciplinary action.”
“...hurt Trump s odds like leaking the existence of the Russia probe before the election...”
“Photo Pete Marovich Bloomberg via Getty Images Peter Strzok the FBI agent who sent anti Trump messages to a colleague while leading the investigation of Hillary Clinton s emails and Russia s involvement in the Trump campaign has said he s willing to testify before the House Judiciary Committee or...”
“...any other committee that wants to talk with him...”
“This could lead to dramatic hearings, as Strzok could expose more information about those probes, and is central to President Trump’s effort to discredit Special Counsel Robert Mueller’s investigation.”
“Reports last week indicated that House Judiciary chairman Bob Goodlatte was preparing to subpoena Strzok as part of the House investigation into the FBI’s conduct during the 2016 election.”
“Strzok s lawyer Aitan Goelman said in a letter to Goodlatte released Sunday that the move would be unnecessary as Strzok intends to voluntarily appear and testify before your committee and any other Congressional committee that invites him The letter noted that Strzok cooperated fully with the DOJ inspector general...”
“...who issued a report last week that was highly critical of the agent...”
“In the lead-up to the 2016 election Strzok and former FBI lawyer Lisa Page, who were having an affair, exchanged anti-Trump messages on their FBI-issued phones.”
“In one, Page asked if Trump might become president and Strzok replied, “No.”


The inspector general referred him, Page, and three other people to the FBI office that handles disciplinary action.
...hurt Trump s odds like leaking the existence of the Russia probe before the election...
Photo Pete Marovich Bloomberg via Getty Images Peter Strzok the FBI agent who sent anti Trump messages to a colleague while leading the investigation of Hillary Clinton s emails and Russia s involvement in the Trump campaign has said he s willing to testify before the House Judiciary Committee or...
...any other committee that wants to talk with him...
This could lead to dramatic hearings, as Strzok could expose more information about those probes, and is central to President Trump’s effort to discredit Special Counsel Robert Mueller’s investigation.
Reports last week indicated that House Judiciary chairman Bob Goodlatte was preparing to subpoena Strzok as part of the House investigation into the FBI’s conduct during the 2016 election.
Strzok s lawyer Aitan Goelman said in a letter to Goodlatte released Sunday that the move would be unnecessary as Strzok intends to voluntarily appear and testify before your committee and any other Congressional committee that invites him The letter noted that Strzok cooperated fully with the DOJ inspector general...
...who issued a report last week that was highly critical of the agent...
In the lead-up to the 2016 election Strzok and former FBI lawyer Lisa Page, who were having an affair, exchanged anti-Trump messages on their FBI-issued phones.
In one, Page asked if Trump might become president and Strzok replied, “No.



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prosecutors and defense lawyers are arguing over whether one of the three drugs used in the process, called midazolam, constitutes "cruel and unusual punishment" because it fails to render inmates unconscious before two other drugs are injected.”
“Legal battles are underway in a number of states, including Arkansas and Ohio, over the constitutionality of controversial lethal injection methods.”
“Like his fellow death row inmates, it isn't likely Roof will be executed anytime soon.”
“After the federal death penalty was suspended by a 1972 U.S. Supreme Court decision, it was brought back 16 years later and three people have since been executed under it.”
“Boston bomber Dzhokhar Tsarnaev, who a jury in 2015 recommended be put to death, remains in a federal lockup in Colorado, where officials say they can better handle his "unique" security arrangements.”
“Three inmates have been on death row since 1993 — drug gang members Richard Tipton, James Roane Jr. and Corey Johnson, who were convicted of killing nine people to protect their crack trade.”
“Read more about the lethal injection controversy hereAs of Feb. 9, there were 62 federal inmates on death row, according to the Death Penalty Information Center.”
“Others include murderer and drug trafficker Raul Garza and Oklahoma City bomber Timothy McVeigh.”
“Roof is now among the long list of well-known criminals who have spent time in the Indiana facility.”
“He also pleaded guilty to nine counts of state murder charges on April 10.”


Prosecutors and defense lawyers are arguing over whether one of the three drugs used in the process, called midazolam, constitutes "cruel and unusual punishment" because it fails to render inmates unconscious before two other drugs are injected.
Legal battles are underway in a number of states, including Arkansas and Ohio, over the constitutionality of controversial lethal injection methods.
Like his fellow death row inmates, it isn't likely Roof will be executed anytime soon.
After the federal death penalty was suspended by a 1972 U.S. Supreme Court decision, it was brought back 16 years later and three people have since been executed under it.
Boston bomber Dzhokhar Tsarnaev, who a jury in 2015 recommended be put to death, remains in a federal lockup in Colorado, where officials say they can better handle his "unique" security arrangements.
Three inmates have been on death row since 1993 — drug gang members Richard Tipton, James Roane Jr. and Corey Johnson, who were convicted of killing nine people to protect their crack trade.
Read more about the lethal injection controversy hereAs of Feb. 9, there were 62 federal inmates on death row, according to the Death Penalty Information Center.
Others include murderer and drug trafficker Raul Garza and Oklahoma City bomber Timothy McVeigh.
Roof is now among the long list of well-known criminals who have spent time in the Indiana facility.
He also pleaded guilty to nine counts of state murder charges on April 10.



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“- Patrick Jones -Sports Writer/!\ Report AbuseCreate a Prank...”
“We will keep you updated on any potential developments.”
“If in fact this game is cancelled it would be a disappointment to fans and alumni alike.”
“...program further by subjecting our already mediocre team to a game that would further humiliate the morale and enthusiasm of our student body...”
“When asked why they were considering canceling the game a spokesman for the UF Athletic Department stated Though both programs are struggling this year dealing with injuries and academic disciplinary action there is no need in embarrassing the UF Athletic...”
“...against the Florida State Seminoles...”
“UF requests to cancel Rivalry game against FSU Friday 22 January 13521 Shares Plagued by yet another atrocious season along with the firing of their head coach the University of Florida Gators are looking to cancel their annual rivalry game...”


- Patrick Jones -Sports Writer/!\ Report AbuseCreate a Prank...
We will keep you updated on any potential developments.
If in fact this game is cancelled it would be a disappointment to fans and alumni alike.
...program further by subjecting our already mediocre team to a game that would further humiliate the morale and enthusiasm of our student body...
When asked why they were considering canceling the game a spokesman for the UF Athletic Department stated Though both programs are struggling this year dealing with injuries and academic disciplinary action there is no need in embarrassing the UF Athletic...
...against the Florida State Seminoles...
UF requests to cancel Rivalry game against FSU Friday 22 January 13521 Shares Plagued by yet another atrocious season along with the firing of their head coach the University of Florida Gators are looking to cancel their annual rivalry game...



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In this particular situation, that’s was what was attempted.””
“...have someone attempt to make financial gain from his mistakes...”
“In doing that I know I m going to hurt the people closest to me who I ve talked to and apologised to them being my wife and my kids and you know it s a shitty moment Hart then explained that he had chosen to fess up rather than...”
““I’m not perfect, I’m not gonna sit up here and claim that I am in any shape or form, and I made a bad error in judgement,” he told his followers.”
“In an Instagram video, Hart said that, though he had never claimed to be perfect, he had recently put himself “in an environment where only bad things would happen”.”
“A day before this tragic incident, comedian Kevin Hart posted a candid social media message confessing that he made a “bad error in judgement” which recently led to an undisclosed individual making an extortion attempt against him.”
“Drugs and alcohol were not factors in the crash, police said.”
“The undisputed king of comedy, as at the time of filing this report, remained in critical condition at MountainView Hospital in Summerlin, police can confirm.”
“Metro Police said 38-year-old US comedian and film star Kevin Hart, was driving faster than the 25 mph speed limit while going north on Spring Gate Lane about 8:20 a.m today.”
“According to the police, Hart lost control of his car and went off the east side of the road and his car crashed head-on into a guardrail while he was driving at a high speed.”


In this particular situation, that’s was what was attempted.”
...have someone attempt to make financial gain from his mistakes...
In doing that I know I m going to hurt the people closest to me who I ve talked to and apologised to them being my wife and my kids and you know it s a shitty moment Hart then explained that he had chosen to fess up rather than...
“I’m not perfect, I’m not gonna sit up here and claim that I am in any shape or form, and I made a bad error in judgement,” he told his followers.
In an Instagram video, Hart said that, though he had never claimed to be perfect, he had recently put himself “in an environment where only bad things would happen”.
A day before this tragic incident, comedian Kevin Hart posted a candid social media message confessing that he made a “bad error in judgement” which recently led to an undisclosed individual making an extortion attempt against him.
Drugs and alcohol were not factors in the crash, police said.
The undisputed king of comedy, as at the time of filing this report, remained in critical condition at MountainView Hospital in Summerlin, police can confirm.
Metro Police said 38-year-old US comedian and film star Kevin Hart, was driving faster than the 25 mph speed limit while going north on Spring Gate Lane about 8:20 a.m today.
According to the police, Hart lost control of his car and went off the east side of the road and his car crashed head-on into a guardrail while he was driving at a high speed.



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That is with 90% extremely negative coverage for President Trump!”
“Again….”
“President Trump’s approval number is at 47% according to Rasmussen today.”
“...poll...”
“President Trump 45 President Obama 44 President Reagan 44 TRENDING FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn FBI Singled Her Out On June 9 2010 Barack Obama s approval number was 46 on the Rasmussen...”
“And that is with 90% negative coverage from the far left mainstream media.”
“President Trump’s approval is now at 45%.”
“According to the latest FOX News poll President Donald Trump has a better rating than Presidents Obama and Reagan at the same point in their presidencies.”


That is with 90% extremely negative coverage for President Trump!
Again….
President Trump’s approval number is at 47% according to Rasmussen today.
...poll...
President Trump 45 President Obama 44 President Reagan 44 TRENDING FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn FBI Singled Her Out On June 9 2010 Barack Obama s approval number was 46 on the Rasmussen...
And that is with 90% negative coverage from the far left mainstream media.
President Trump’s approval is now at 45%.
According to the latest FOX News poll President Donald Trump has a better rating than Presidents Obama and Reagan at the same point in their presidencies.



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Associated Press contributed to this report.”
“He decided, instead, to stay in class for about 20 minutes doing homework after his teacher and fellow classmates left and locked the door.”
“Jacob Shoemaker, a senior at Hilliard Davidson High School, said he didn’t want to take sides in the gun-control debate consuming the country.”
“If he went outside for the walkout, he said, he would be supporting gun control.”
“If he stayed in the common area of the school, he said, he would be seen as supporting gun violence and disrespecting the 17 lives lost in the Parkland, Fla. High school shooting the month before.”
“Jacob had met with the school’s principal on Tuesday, a day before the rally, for about an hour to find out what exactly the walkout was supporting.”
“But he said the principal reportedly told him it was for the students to express themselves COLLEGE STUDENT KICKED OUT OF CLASS FOR TELLING PROFESSOR THERE ARE ONLY TWO GENDERS This left Jacob wondering if it was a memorial for the lives lost or a show of support for gun...”
“...control...”
“When they returned, he was slapped with a suspension.”
““He didn’t ask for this.”CHICAGO STUDENTS ALLEGEDLY TRASH WALMART DURING NATIONAL SCHOOL WALKOUT PROTESTThe district says it's responsible for students' safety and they can't be unsupervised.”


The Associated Press contributed to this report.
He decided, instead, to stay in class for about 20 minutes doing homework after his teacher and fellow classmates left and locked the door.
Jacob Shoemaker, a senior at Hilliard Davidson High School, said he didn’t want to take sides in the gun-control debate consuming the country.
If he went outside for the walkout, he said, he would be supporting gun control.
If he stayed in the common area of the school, he said, he would be seen as supporting gun violence and disrespecting the 17 lives lost in the Parkland, Fla. High school shooting the month before.
Jacob had met with the school’s principal on Tuesday, a day before the rally, for about an hour to find out what exactly the walkout was supporting.
But he said the principal reportedly told him it was for the students to express themselves COLLEGE STUDENT KICKED OUT OF CLASS FOR TELLING PROFESSOR THERE ARE ONLY TWO GENDERS This left Jacob wondering if it was a memorial for the lives lost or a show of support for gun...
...control...
When they returned, he was slapped with a suspension.
“He didn’t ask for this.”CHICAGO STUDENTS ALLEGEDLY TRASH WALMART DURING NATIONAL SCHOOL WALKOUT PROTESTThe district says it's responsible for students' safety and they can't be unsupervised.



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As is done every year the FDA convenes this panel to consider the recommendations made by the World Health Organization WHO regarding the composition of influenza vaccines for the Northern Hemisphere and to help the FDA select strains for next season s flu vaccines in the U S WHO has...”
“Looking ahead to the 2018-2019 flu seasonWhile this scientific work is underway, the composition of next season’s flu vaccines will be the subject of an FDA advisory committee meeting March 1, 2018.”
“The data show that overall vaccine effectiveness for H1N1 and influenza B was 67 percent and 42 percent, respectively, for all age groups combined.”
“The vaccines did do much better for other viruses that are also causing the flu this season.”
“...even lower...”
“Of note the effectiveness of the vaccine against H3N2 in children 6 months to 8 years of age was 51 percent this season yet the effectiveness in those 65 years and older was only 17 percent and the effectiveness in older children and adults under 65 years of age was...”
“While that finding isn’t too far off from the vaccine effectiveness seen against H3N2 in previous years, we need to take new steps to improve vaccine efficacy against H3N2.”
“Overall, preliminary vaccine effectiveness reported by Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) for H3N2 influenza was 25 percent, which means that people who received the vaccine were 25 percent less likely to be sick and need to see a doctor.”
“We’re taking steps to investigate each of these potential causes, rule out possible reasons for the variation in effectiveness and improve vaccine efficacy against H3N2.”
“Reduced effectiveness of 2017-2018 seasonal vaccines against H3N2There are a number of theories on why this season’s vaccines produced reduced effectiveness against H3N2.”


As is done every year the FDA convenes this panel to consider the recommendations made by the World Health Organization WHO regarding the composition of influenza vaccines for the Northern Hemisphere and to help the FDA select strains for next season s flu vaccines in the U S WHO has...
Looking ahead to the 2018-2019 flu seasonWhile this scientific work is underway, the composition of next season’s flu vaccines will be the subject of an FDA advisory committee meeting March 1, 2018.
The data show that overall vaccine effectiveness for H1N1 and influenza B was 67 percent and 42 percent, respectively, for all age groups combined.
The vaccines did do much better for other viruses that are also causing the flu this season.
...even lower...
Of note the effectiveness of the vaccine against H3N2 in children 6 months to 8 years of age was 51 percent this season yet the effectiveness in those 65 years and older was only 17 percent and the effectiveness in older children and adults under 65 years of age was...
While that finding isn’t too far off from the vaccine effectiveness seen against H3N2 in previous years, we need to take new steps to improve vaccine efficacy against H3N2.
Overall, preliminary vaccine effectiveness reported by Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) for H3N2 influenza was 25 percent, which means that people who received the vaccine were 25 percent less likely to be sick and need to see a doctor.
We’re taking steps to investigate each of these potential causes, rule out possible reasons for the variation in effectiveness and improve vaccine efficacy against H3N2.
Reduced effectiveness of 2017-2018 seasonal vaccines against H3N2There are a number of theories on why this season’s vaccines produced reduced effectiveness against H3N2.



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Proverbs 15:18)”
“Welcome to politics in America.”
“...a paper that has officially endorsed Jones has actually been bribing people to dig up dirt on Moore...”
“We ve had people back home telling us they are getting phone calls and when they would tell them good things the Washington Post would ask them if they knew anything bad on him Well her story continues to be corroborated as witnesses have come forward saying the Washington Post...”
“Kayla Moore, Roy Moore’s wife, in an exclusive statement to The Activist Mommy yesterday, told us that “The Washington Post has been calling and harassing our friends and family, trying to find garbage.”
“Buckle up RINOS…time to meet a real man!”
“Roy Moore will win big!”
“The establishment doesn’t want Roy Moore, a man who can’t be bought or bribed, to pull up their political skirts and overturn their tables of corruption and greed!”
“Consider how suspicious this is – a woman comes forward 39 years later with a vicious never-before-made accusation – and how is one suppose to defend oneself and prove it is a lie 39 years later?”
“Like a club or a sword or a sharp arrow is one who gives false testimony against a neighbor.”


(Proverbs 15:18)
Welcome to politics in America.
...a paper that has officially endorsed Jones has actually been bribing people to dig up dirt on Moore...
We ve had people back home telling us they are getting phone calls and when they would tell them good things the Washington Post would ask them if they knew anything bad on him Well her story continues to be corroborated as witnesses have come forward saying the Washington Post...
Kayla Moore, Roy Moore’s wife, in an exclusive statement to The Activist Mommy yesterday, told us that “The Washington Post has been calling and harassing our friends and family, trying to find garbage.
Buckle up RINOS…time to meet a real man!
Roy Moore will win big!
The establishment doesn’t want Roy Moore, a man who can’t be bought or bribed, to pull up their political skirts and overturn their tables of corruption and greed!
Consider how suspicious this is – a woman comes forward 39 years later with a vicious never-before-made accusation – and how is one suppose to defend oneself and prove it is a lie 39 years later?
Like a club or a sword or a sharp arrow is one who gives false testimony against a neighbor.



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...that define the history of human identity and the often humorous struggle of how they cope in the age of mass mediation...”
“Unlike the paparazzi photo where the actual real celebrity is caught on film in a frozen moment in time Jackson s productions where the likenesses are recognisable use the celebrity aura to address a deeper universal lineage the archetypal characters...”
“...social commentary which has its historical roots in artist William Hogarth strips away the veneer of PR and hype that prop up the celebrities that come under her scrutiny...”
“In this way my productions charged with desire have become more real than the real life model they are based on evolving into a mental image rather than a direct record of reality Jackson s staging her subversive form of...”
“This whole projective process is further exaggerated by our capacity for fantasy and the inherently titillating nature of the image of a celebrity like Marilyn in flagrante.”
“However, what we actually do is create a narcissistic circle where we assert our control over the object of desire: we transform our celebrities into what we want.”
“‘At best, a photograph of a celebrity reproduces something authentic only at the very moment the shutter clicks’ says the artist ‘yet we have been teased into giving these moments an absolute and unquestioned authority.”
“Jackson’s productions stress-test the implicit belief that a photograph can capture a frozen moment of ‘truth’.”
“...of media icons such as Diana Princess of Wales the Queen of England Marilyn Monroe George Bush Brad and Angelina and David Beckham...”
“Her notorious photographic portraits life like sculptures films and videos are startlingly realistically staged affairs that cast uncannily styled actors into an entirely fathomable projection of a future that could have been or the intimate often salacious imagined private moments...”


...that define the history of human identity and the often humorous struggle of how they cope in the age of mass mediation...
Unlike the paparazzi photo where the actual real celebrity is caught on film in a frozen moment in time Jackson s productions where the likenesses are recognisable use the celebrity aura to address a deeper universal lineage the archetypal characters...
...social commentary which has its historical roots in artist William Hogarth strips away the veneer of PR and hype that prop up the celebrities that come under her scrutiny...
In this way my productions charged with desire have become more real than the real life model they are based on evolving into a mental image rather than a direct record of reality Jackson s staging her subversive form of...
This whole projective process is further exaggerated by our capacity for fantasy and the inherently titillating nature of the image of a celebrity like Marilyn in flagrante.
However, what we actually do is create a narcissistic circle where we assert our control over the object of desire: we transform our celebrities into what we want.
‘At best, a photograph of a celebrity reproduces something authentic only at the very moment the shutter clicks’ says the artist ‘yet we have been teased into giving these moments an absolute and unquestioned authority.
Jackson’s productions stress-test the implicit belief that a photograph can capture a frozen moment of ‘truth’.
...of media icons such as Diana Princess of Wales the Queen of England Marilyn Monroe George Bush Brad and Angelina and David Beckham...
Her notorious photographic portraits life like sculptures films and videos are startlingly realistically staged affairs that cast uncannily styled actors into an entirely fathomable projection of a future that could have been or the intimate often salacious imagined private moments...



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Criminal Division’s Office of International Affairs has provided significant assistance in this matter.”
“Attorneys David I. Salem and Michael T. Packard of the District of Maryland, are prosecuting the case.”
“Here is the Statement Below An indictment against a former co president of a Maryland based transportation company that provides services for the transportation of nuclear materials to customers in the United States and abroad was unsealed today for his alleged role in a scheme that involved the bribery of...”
“OIG and Assistant Director in Charge Andew W Vale of the FBI s Washington D C Field Office as mentioned in the DOJ statement...”
“The team members are Acting Assistant Attorney General John P Cronan of the Justice Department s Criminal Division Acting U S Attorney Stephen M Schenning of the District of Maryland Principal Deputy Inspector General April G Stephenson of the U S Department of Energy s Office of Inspector General DOE”
“The hard working and honest DOJ team, under Jeff Sessions, made the announcement yesterday.”
“...contracts with TENEX KUDOS to the Trump era DOJ American s can trust...”
“The charges stem from an alleged scheme to bribe Vadim Mikerin a Russian official at JSC Techsnabexport TENEX a subsidiary of Russia s State Atomic Energy Corporation and the sole supplier and exporter of Russian Federation uranium and uranium enrichment services to nuclear power companies worldwide in order to secure...”
“And it stems from Russian collusion in the Obama-era.”
“...of violating the FCPA two counts of wire fraud and one count of international promotion money laundering This is serious...”


The Criminal Division’s Office of International Affairs has provided significant assistance in this matter.
Attorneys David I. Salem and Michael T. Packard of the District of Maryland, are prosecuting the case.
Here is the Statement Below An indictment against a former co president of a Maryland based transportation company that provides services for the transportation of nuclear materials to customers in the United States and abroad was unsealed today for his alleged role in a scheme that involved the bribery of...
OIG and Assistant Director in Charge Andew W Vale of the FBI s Washington D C Field Office as mentioned in the DOJ statement...
The team members are Acting Assistant Attorney General John P Cronan of the Justice Department s Criminal Division Acting U S Attorney Stephen M Schenning of the District of Maryland Principal Deputy Inspector General April G Stephenson of the U S Department of Energy s Office of Inspector General DOE
The hard working and honest DOJ team, under Jeff Sessions, made the announcement yesterday.
...contracts with TENEX KUDOS to the Trump era DOJ American s can trust...
The charges stem from an alleged scheme to bribe Vadim Mikerin a Russian official at JSC Techsnabexport TENEX a subsidiary of Russia s State Atomic Energy Corporation and the sole supplier and exporter of Russian Federation uranium and uranium enrichment services to nuclear power companies worldwide in order to secure...
And it stems from Russian collusion in the Obama-era.
...of violating the FCPA two counts of wire fraud and one count of international promotion money laundering This is serious...



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“SOURCECommentscomments...”
“Not now,” Clovis concluded.”
“...doesn t seem to have any of those credentials...”
“He has never taken science as part of his graduate course and questions the legitimacy of climate change.”
“Although he has a doctorate in public administration and taught business and public policy at Morningside College for ten years, he barely published any academic work.”
“Clovis had made a reputation for himself as a conservative talk radio show in Iowa and an avid Trump supporter.”
“When asked to comment on his credentials in a recent interview with KYXL Radio Clovis who is currently working as the senior White House advisor within the USDA argued that he was proud he didn t have any scientific credentials or education because scientists are nothing more than a bunch...”
“...of mislead individuals anyway Asked to elaborate he said that he was glad to be working in the Trump administration but that he was at the same time disappointed as to where he was assigned...”
““While I can certainly appreciate President Trump’s reasons for placing me at my current position, at the same time I can’t help but feel as though my abilities are being severely misused here,” he said.”
““I do not agree with anything these people are trying to do.”


SOURCECommentscomments...
Not now,” Clovis concluded.
...doesn t seem to have any of those credentials...
He has never taken science as part of his graduate course and questions the legitimacy of climate change.
Although he has a doctorate in public administration and taught business and public policy at Morningside College for ten years, he barely published any academic work.
Clovis had made a reputation for himself as a conservative talk radio show in Iowa and an avid Trump supporter.
When asked to comment on his credentials in a recent interview with KYXL Radio Clovis who is currently working as the senior White House advisor within the USDA argued that he was proud he didn t have any scientific credentials or education because scientists are nothing more than a bunch...
...of mislead individuals anyway Asked to elaborate he said that he was glad to be working in the Trump administration but that he was at the same time disappointed as to where he was assigned...
“While I can certainly appreciate President Trump’s reasons for placing me at my current position, at the same time I can’t help but feel as though my abilities are being severely misused here,” he said.
“I do not agree with anything these people are trying to do.



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source...”
“Checks will start arriving in the mail Friday.”
“You, your wife and your children will all be receiving a stimulus bonus of $612 each to spend however you see fit inside the United States.”
“The program, called “Tax Relief For Deserving Americans,” will give nothing to those who choose not to work, people in prison or illegal aliens.”
“People on welfare in good standing with work programs or job training will receive an extra $25 in bonus food stamps instead.”
“The White House Communication and Propaganda Office released a statement about the program and how it will impact the economy While deciding how to distract the American people from the nonsense being reported by the fake news media about world events and interior politics President Trump was reminded of hoiw...”
“...much everyone enjoyed the money George W Bush handed out from the surplus left over from the Clinton administration...”
“Mr. trump has decided people would rather focus ion spending some money than the nonsense on the “news,” and has therefore authorized the release of $612 each for every legal American from a working family.”
“Democrats are already crying because the people who will receive their chunk of the $153 billion program don’t necessarily need the money that could be spent buying them votes from deadbeats who like free stuff.”
“They also don’t understand how the program will be paid for.”


Source...
Checks will start arriving in the mail Friday.
You, your wife and your children will all be receiving a stimulus bonus of $612 each to spend however you see fit inside the United States.
The program, called “Tax Relief For Deserving Americans,” will give nothing to those who choose not to work, people in prison or illegal aliens.
People on welfare in good standing with work programs or job training will receive an extra $25 in bonus food stamps instead.
The White House Communication and Propaganda Office released a statement about the program and how it will impact the economy While deciding how to distract the American people from the nonsense being reported by the fake news media about world events and interior politics President Trump was reminded of hoiw...
...much everyone enjoyed the money George W Bush handed out from the surplus left over from the Clinton administration...
Mr. trump has decided people would rather focus ion spending some money than the nonsense on the “news,” and has therefore authorized the release of $612 each for every legal American from a working family.
Democrats are already crying because the people who will receive their chunk of the $153 billion program don’t necessarily need the money that could be spent buying them votes from deadbeats who like free stuff.
They also don’t understand how the program will be paid for.



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You’re a real piece of work.”
“Not while my God still relies on me to do the right thing.”God Bless you, Kim Davis.”
“Just not in my building.”
“...down the street...”
“Davis is expected to return to her job in the Clerk s office where she can now refuse to issue marriage licences to gays and not worry about it becoming a national scandal Davis said I told them all along I didn t care if they went to the county...”
“She’s the perfect candidate for a Trump pardon, and that’s exactly what she got.”
“She’s a conscientious freedom fighter who wouldn’t stand by while her rights were trampled and her very existence threatened.”
“A criminal is the farthest thing from what she is.”
“With her record cleared, she no longer has to check in with anyone or list herself on job, volunteer and credit applications as a criminal.”
“Davis has been seeing a probation officer monthly since the incident nearly two years ago now to prove she’s in compliance with the judge’s orders.”


You’re a real piece of work.
Not while my God still relies on me to do the right thing.”God Bless you, Kim Davis.
Just not in my building.
...down the street...
Davis is expected to return to her job in the Clerk s office where she can now refuse to issue marriage licences to gays and not worry about it becoming a national scandal Davis said I told them all along I didn t care if they went to the county...
She’s the perfect candidate for a Trump pardon, and that’s exactly what she got.
She’s a conscientious freedom fighter who wouldn’t stand by while her rights were trampled and her very existence threatened.
A criminal is the farthest thing from what she is.
With her record cleared, she no longer has to check in with anyone or list herself on job, volunteer and credit applications as a criminal.
Davis has been seeing a probation officer monthly since the incident nearly two years ago now to prove she’s in compliance with the judge’s orders.



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They’re just laying on my feet during tea,” Meghan replied, laughing with the prince.”
“This one walks in and absolutely nothing, just wagging tails,” the Queen’s grandson said in a BBC interview in November, gesturing to Meghan.”
“Related: Royal wedding 2018: What we know so far“I spent the last 33 years being barked at.”
“PHOTO: STF/AFP/Getty ImagesMore recently, Prince Harry’s fiancée Meghan Markle appeared to have won over the beloved canines.”
“PHOTO: Anwar Hussein/Hulton Archive/Getty ImagesQueen Elizabeth II with her corgis in 1969.”
“The royal couple have also owned "dorgies" -- a cross between a dachshund and a corgi.”
“Such was Queen Elilzabeth’s attachment to Susan, she reportedly took the dog on honeymoon with Prince Philip in 1947.”
“Since then, she has owned dozens of the breed, known for its distinctive short legs and standing-up ears.”
“She received Susan as a gift after becoming attached to her father King George VI’s corgi called Dookie, the Daily Mail reported.”
“PHOTO: PA Wire/APWhile the Queen still reportedly owns several other dogs, Willow was the only remaining descendant of Susan, the original corgi given to then-Princess Elizabeth on her 18th birthday in 1944.”


“They’re just laying on my feet during tea,” Meghan replied, laughing with the prince.
This one walks in and absolutely nothing, just wagging tails,” the Queen’s grandson said in a BBC interview in November, gesturing to Meghan.
Related: Royal wedding 2018: What we know so far“I spent the last 33 years being barked at.
PHOTO: STF/AFP/Getty ImagesMore recently, Prince Harry’s fiancée Meghan Markle appeared to have won over the beloved canines.
PHOTO: Anwar Hussein/Hulton Archive/Getty ImagesQueen Elizabeth II with her corgis in 1969.
The royal couple have also owned "dorgies" -- a cross between a dachshund and a corgi.
Such was Queen Elilzabeth’s attachment to Susan, she reportedly took the dog on honeymoon with Prince Philip in 1947.
Since then, she has owned dozens of the breed, known for its distinctive short legs and standing-up ears.
She received Susan as a gift after becoming attached to her father King George VI’s corgi called Dookie, the Daily Mail reported.
PHOTO: PA Wire/APWhile the Queen still reportedly owns several other dogs, Willow was the only remaining descendant of Susan, the original corgi given to then-Princess Elizabeth on her 18th birthday in 1944.



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Baio had no known connection to the Clintons — Trey Gowdy is investigating.”
“The plane fell nearly 1400 feet to the basin below where very little was recognizable.”
“Scott Baio, 56, was killed when the single-engine Cessna he was in crashed into the side of a hill in Louisiana.”
“Baio was headed to Mar-A-Lago to barbecue shrimp and play gold with President Trump.”
“Baio’s wife, Raylene, wasn’t on the plane but was checked into St Timothy’s on a suicide watch after the news sent her into a breakdown.”
“Spokesmen for several actors who wouldn t be caught dead in a film with Baio said that he was really special as Chachi and he sure did do a nice job with Charles in Charge Baio wildly successful as an actor since the ripe age of 13 says he saved...”
“...every dime he ever made so he could live the lavish lifestyle of jetting across the country to golf with famous and powerful people...”
“Unfortunately that ended with a net worth of about 3 5 million and a whole lot of that was tied up in that nice house of his so Baio was forced to go Cessna instead which only would have gotten him there slightly faster than that new Kia Sorento he...”
“...s been sporting...”
“Baio will be missed by many.”


Baio had no known connection to the Clintons — Trey Gowdy is investigating.
The plane fell nearly 1400 feet to the basin below where very little was recognizable.
Scott Baio, 56, was killed when the single-engine Cessna he was in crashed into the side of a hill in Louisiana.
Baio was headed to Mar-A-Lago to barbecue shrimp and play gold with President Trump.
Baio’s wife, Raylene, wasn’t on the plane but was checked into St Timothy’s on a suicide watch after the news sent her into a breakdown.
Spokesmen for several actors who wouldn t be caught dead in a film with Baio said that he was really special as Chachi and he sure did do a nice job with Charles in Charge Baio wildly successful as an actor since the ripe age of 13 says he saved...
...every dime he ever made so he could live the lavish lifestyle of jetting across the country to golf with famous and powerful people...
Unfortunately that ended with a net worth of about 3 5 million and a whole lot of that was tied up in that nice house of his so Baio was forced to go Cessna instead which only would have gotten him there slightly faster than that new Kia Sorento he...
...s been sporting...
Baio will be missed by many.



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...any matters from which I have recused myself to the extent they exist...”
“Consistent with the succession order for the Department of Justice Acting Deputy Attorney General and U S Attorney for the Eastern District of Virginia Dana Boente shall act as and perform the functions of the Attorney General with respect to...”
““This announcement should not be interpreted as confirmation of the existence of any investigation or suggestive of the scope of any such investigation.”
““I have taken no actions regarding any such matters, to the extent they exist.”
““Having concluded those meetings today, I have decided to recuse myself from any existing or future investigations of any matters related in any way to the campaigns for President of the United States.”
“I should recuse myself from any matters arising from the campaigns for President of the United States...”
“...impartiality might reasonably be questioned I would consult with Department ethics officials regarding the most appropriate way to proceed During the course of the last several weeks I have met with the relevant senior career Department officials to discuss whether...”
“Attorney General Jeff Sessions today issued the following statement During the course of the confirmation proceedings on my nomination to be Attorney General I advised the Senate Judiciary Committee that i f a specific matter arose where I believed my...”


...any matters from which I have recused myself to the extent they exist...
Consistent with the succession order for the Department of Justice Acting Deputy Attorney General and U S Attorney for the Eastern District of Virginia Dana Boente shall act as and perform the functions of the Attorney General with respect to...
“This announcement should not be interpreted as confirmation of the existence of any investigation or suggestive of the scope of any such investigation.
“I have taken no actions regarding any such matters, to the extent they exist.
“Having concluded those meetings today, I have decided to recuse myself from any existing or future investigations of any matters related in any way to the campaigns for President of the United States.
I should recuse myself from any matters arising from the campaigns for President of the United States...
...impartiality might reasonably be questioned I would consult with Department ethics officials regarding the most appropriate way to proceed During the course of the last several weeks I have met with the relevant senior career Department officials to discuss whether...
Attorney General Jeff Sessions today issued the following statement During the course of the confirmation proceedings on my nomination to be Attorney General I advised the Senate Judiciary Committee that i f a specific matter arose where I believed my...



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jehovah’s Witnesses, who are known for door-to-door preaching and handing out literature, reject some of mainstream Christianity’s core beliefs and have more than 8.3 million members around the world...”
““The property of the Jehovah’s Witnesses organization is to be confiscated to the state revenue.”A lawyer for the justice ministry, Svetlana Borisova, told the court adherents “pose a threat to the rights of the citizens, public order and public security”.”
““The Supreme Court has ruled to sustain the claim of Russia’s ministry of justice and deem the ‘Administrative Centre of Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia’ organization extremist, eliminate it and ban its activity in Russia,” said judge Yuri Ivanenko.”
“Its decision will come into effect within 30 days unless an appeal is lodged, when it will be delayed until the resolution of the case.”
“The Supreme Court was deciding on a claim lodged by the Russian ministry of justice to liquidate the group’s administrative centre near St Petersburg and 395 local organizations.”
“The case could be taken to the European Court of Human Rights, which ruled a previous attempted ban on Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia unlawful in 2010.”
“The ruling, which affects more than 100,000 Jehovah’s Witness worshippers across Russia, is a serious breach of Russia’s obligations to respect and protect religious freedom.”
“Russia’s Supreme Court ruled on April 20, 2017 that the Jehovah’s Witnesses organization should be closed down and no longer allowed to operate legally in Russia, Human Rights Watch said today.”
““As this is an infringement of your fundamental human rights, I therefore urge you to seek asylum in the United States until your rights are fully reinstated.” – Trump urged.”
“Trump went on to invite all Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia to seek asylum in the United States until their religious rights are reinstated in Russia.”


Jehovah’s Witnesses, who are known for door-to-door preaching and handing out literature, reject some of mainstream Christianity’s core beliefs and have more than 8.3 million members around the world...
“The property of the Jehovah’s Witnesses organization is to be confiscated to the state revenue.”A lawyer for the justice ministry, Svetlana Borisova, told the court adherents “pose a threat to the rights of the citizens, public order and public security”.
“The Supreme Court has ruled to sustain the claim of Russia’s ministry of justice and deem the ‘Administrative Centre of Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia’ organization extremist, eliminate it and ban its activity in Russia,” said judge Yuri Ivanenko.
Its decision will come into effect within 30 days unless an appeal is lodged, when it will be delayed until the resolution of the case.
The Supreme Court was deciding on a claim lodged by the Russian ministry of justice to liquidate the group’s administrative centre near St Petersburg and 395 local organizations.
The case could be taken to the European Court of Human Rights, which ruled a previous attempted ban on Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia unlawful in 2010.
The ruling, which affects more than 100,000 Jehovah’s Witness worshippers across Russia, is a serious breach of Russia’s obligations to respect and protect religious freedom.
Russia’s Supreme Court ruled on April 20, 2017 that the Jehovah’s Witnesses organization should be closed down and no longer allowed to operate legally in Russia, Human Rights Watch said today.
“As this is an infringement of your fundamental human rights, I therefore urge you to seek asylum in the United States until your rights are fully reinstated.” – Trump urged.
Trump went on to invite all Jehovah’s Witnesses in Russia to seek asylum in the United States until their religious rights are reinstated in Russia.



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...it by keeping their weapons Democrats like Rep Swalwell are enemies of the Constitution and enemies of We the People The Rest HERE”
“This would leave millions of assault weapons in our communities for decades to come Instead we should ban possession of military style semiautomatic assault weapons we should buy back such weapons from all who choose to abide by the law and we should criminally prosecute any who choose to defy...”
““Reinstating the federal assault weapons ban that was in effect from 1994 to 2004 would prohibit manufacture and sales, but it would not affect weapons already possessed,” Rep. Swalwell wrote in his op-ed for USA Today.”
“...personally deems reckless and unnecessary...”
“Not content to simply impose a fresh ban on all new assault weapon purchases which in and of itself is unconstitutional Rep Swalwell actually wants to see door to door gun confiscation teams engage in Nazi style removal tactics in order to rid the streets of all firearms that he...”
“Rep. Swalwell even goes a step further, insisting that those who refuse to hand over their “assault” weapons be criminally prosecuted – including law-abiding gun owners who have never been convicted of committing a crime with their legally-purchased weaponry.”
“Representative Eric Swalwell from California’s 15th District wrote that all so-called “assault” weapons need to be banned, and that a federal gun buy-back program needs to be instituted in order to effectively collect them all from the citizenry.”
“...by: Ethan HuffNaturalNews.comMonday, May 07, 2018A California Democrat was recently given a platform by USA Today to publish a shocking editorial that calls for nationwide confiscation of all “military-style semiautomatic assault weapons” from law-abiding citizens.”


...it by keeping their weapons Democrats like Rep Swalwell are enemies of the Constitution and enemies of We the People The Rest HERE
This would leave millions of assault weapons in our communities for decades to come Instead we should ban possession of military style semiautomatic assault weapons we should buy back such weapons from all who choose to abide by the law and we should criminally prosecute any who choose to defy...
“Reinstating the federal assault weapons ban that was in effect from 1994 to 2004 would prohibit manufacture and sales, but it would not affect weapons already possessed,” Rep. Swalwell wrote in his op-ed for USA Today.
...personally deems reckless and unnecessary...
Not content to simply impose a fresh ban on all new assault weapon purchases which in and of itself is unconstitutional Rep Swalwell actually wants to see door to door gun confiscation teams engage in Nazi style removal tactics in order to rid the streets of all firearms that he...
Rep. Swalwell even goes a step further, insisting that those who refuse to hand over their “assault” weapons be criminally prosecuted – including law-abiding gun owners who have never been convicted of committing a crime with their legally-purchased weaponry.
Representative Eric Swalwell from California’s 15th District wrote that all so-called “assault” weapons need to be banned, and that a federal gun buy-back program needs to be instituted in order to effectively collect them all from the citizenry.
...by: Ethan HuffNaturalNews.comMonday, May 07, 2018A California Democrat was recently given a platform by USA Today to publish a shocking editorial that calls for nationwide confiscation of all “military-style semiautomatic assault weapons” from law-abiding citizens.



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“H/T: Extra News Feed...”
““I know that all Ms. Barr wants to do is make America great again and kudos to Fox for keeping that hope alive.”“Roseanne” will air on Monday nights at 8:00pm on the Fox Network starting in September.”
““Big news for ‘Roseanne’ fans and everyone who enjoys ‘black’ humor,” tweeted the president on Tuesday night.”
“President Donald Trump, who had called Ms. Barr earlier in the year to congratulate her on the success of her show, and who uses Fox programming to promote his administration’s policies, was thrilled to hear that “Roseanne” would be coming to his favorite network.”
“...immediate condemnation on social media from all moderate voices but cheers among Fox s white supremacist fans...”
“And we know our audience of narrow minded unsophisticated bumpkins will welcome her just as enthusiastically In her vulgar post Ms Barr wrote that Valerie Jarrett an African American adviser to President Barack Obama was the offspring of the muslim brotherhood planet of the apes The abhorrent tweet met with...”
““The controversy regarding Ms. Barr’s racially charged Twitter message, as well as her bigoted attitudes, are just some of the reasons we’re happy to welcome her to the Fox family.”
““We’re excited to announce that ‘Roseanne’ will be coming to Fox this fall,” said Brian Sullivan, Fox Networks Group president and COO.”
“Advertisement – story continues belowJust hours after ABC canceled its hit sitcom “Roseanne” due to an ugly racist tweet by its controversial star, Roseanne Barr, the Fox Network said it would be picking up the show.”
“After ABC cancels Roseanne Barr’s hit show in response to her stunning racist tweet, the network of bigots comes to the rescue.”


H/T: Extra News Feed...
“I know that all Ms. Barr wants to do is make America great again and kudos to Fox for keeping that hope alive.”“Roseanne” will air on Monday nights at 8:00pm on the Fox Network starting in September.
“Big news for ‘Roseanne’ fans and everyone who enjoys ‘black’ humor,” tweeted the president on Tuesday night.
President Donald Trump, who had called Ms. Barr earlier in the year to congratulate her on the success of her show, and who uses Fox programming to promote his administration’s policies, was thrilled to hear that “Roseanne” would be coming to his favorite network.
...immediate condemnation on social media from all moderate voices but cheers among Fox s white supremacist fans...
And we know our audience of narrow minded unsophisticated bumpkins will welcome her just as enthusiastically In her vulgar post Ms Barr wrote that Valerie Jarrett an African American adviser to President Barack Obama was the offspring of the muslim brotherhood planet of the apes The abhorrent tweet met with...
“The controversy regarding Ms. Barr’s racially charged Twitter message, as well as her bigoted attitudes, are just some of the reasons we’re happy to welcome her to the Fox family.
“We’re excited to announce that ‘Roseanne’ will be coming to Fox this fall,” said Brian Sullivan, Fox Networks Group president and COO.
Advertisement – story continues belowJust hours after ABC canceled its hit sitcom “Roseanne” due to an ugly racist tweet by its controversial star, Roseanne Barr, the Fox Network said it would be picking up the show.
After ABC cancels Roseanne Barr’s hit show in response to her stunning racist tweet, the network of bigots comes to the rescue.



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““How can this be a sound policy?””
“...and work permits and so forth he said...”
“In protesting the Trump administration’s policies toward illegal immigration, liberal commentators and writers have been embracing the idea of gutting the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency, which identifies, arrests and deports illegal immigrants inside the United States.”
““This is a growing position on the left, and I imagine 2020 Democratic presidential aspirants will have to grapple with it,” liberal writer and MSNBC host Chris Hayes tweeted.”
“In January, the idea was endorsed by Brian Fallon, a former top aide to 2016 Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton, and Eric Holder, President Barack Obama’s attorney general.”
“The Daily Caller first drew attention to the calls.”
““ICE operates as an unaccountable deportation force,” Fallon tweeted.”
““Dems running in 2020 should campaign on ending the agency in its current form.”Thomas Homan, the acting director of ICE, has reacted to these calls by Democrats by saying they should speak to victims of illegal immigrant crime.”
“These politicians they need to talk to the victims of alien crime talk to the parents that I talk to that lost children at the hands of criminal aliens Homan said Thursday on Fox News Tucker Carlson Tonight But the idea has picked up steam in recent days after Hayes...”
“...the MSNBC host asked Democratic California Sen Kamala Harris if she believes ICE should exist...”


“How can this be a sound policy?”
...and work permits and so forth he said...
In protesting the Trump administration’s policies toward illegal immigration, liberal commentators and writers have been embracing the idea of gutting the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency, which identifies, arrests and deports illegal immigrants inside the United States.
“This is a growing position on the left, and I imagine 2020 Democratic presidential aspirants will have to grapple with it,” liberal writer and MSNBC host Chris Hayes tweeted.
In January, the idea was endorsed by Brian Fallon, a former top aide to 2016 Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton, and Eric Holder, President Barack Obama’s attorney general.
The Daily Caller first drew attention to the calls.
“ICE operates as an unaccountable deportation force,” Fallon tweeted.
“Dems running in 2020 should campaign on ending the agency in its current form.”Thomas Homan, the acting director of ICE, has reacted to these calls by Democrats by saying they should speak to victims of illegal immigrant crime.
These politicians they need to talk to the victims of alien crime talk to the parents that I talk to that lost children at the hands of criminal aliens Homan said Thursday on Fox News Tucker Carlson Tonight But the idea has picked up steam in recent days after Hayes...
...the MSNBC host asked Democratic California Sen Kamala Harris if she believes ICE should exist...



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“0Commentscomments...”
“George W. Bush left a piece of mirror and a rolled up hundred.”
“Bill Clinton left one of his saxophones.”
“William Howard Taft left his giant bathtub.”
“...as every president is allowed to leave one thing in the White House that must never be touched by future presidents...”
“In that regard I have commissioned this statute with plans to have it permanently erected in the entryway of the White House so that all who enter can remember me fondly The statue will not be allowed to be removed...”
“I have created something that no future president will be able to do.”
““I have created a legacy that should not be diminished.”
““I have been president for only eight years, and in that time, I have done what no other presidents could do in all their time in total,” said Obama.”
“The president says that his legacy “should not be diminished,” and that this is the only way he can “keep an eye” over Trump, as well as future presidents.”


0Commentscomments...
George W. Bush left a piece of mirror and a rolled up hundred.
Bill Clinton left one of his saxophones.
William Howard Taft left his giant bathtub.
...as every president is allowed to leave one thing in the White House that must never be touched by future presidents...
In that regard I have commissioned this statute with plans to have it permanently erected in the entryway of the White House so that all who enter can remember me fondly The statue will not be allowed to be removed...
I have created something that no future president will be able to do.
“I have created a legacy that should not be diminished.
“I have been president for only eight years, and in that time, I have done what no other presidents could do in all their time in total,” said Obama.
The president says that his legacy “should not be diminished,” and that this is the only way he can “keep an eye” over Trump, as well as future presidents.



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SOURCE:”
“President Trump doesn’t mess around.”
“The alleged file on Franken includes things like pushing entitlement programs that are meant to give away free stuff for votes and adultery.”
“With Schumer out of the way it will grow even stronger.”
“It doesn’t matter how many more votes the Dems get, the GOP continues to grow stronger.”
“One of these days the Democrats will realize they can’t keep up with the winning strategy of the Republican party.”
“No more of this pussyfooting around with majority votes and filibusters…either get in line of get out.”
“Not only does he get rid of a huge political opponent, he shows America that our elected officials can be compromised and forced to do as they’re told.”
“This was a great move by Trump.”
“Rather than face the backlash and vindictive response from the Trump administration to his requests to play ball, Franken will resign, deny all of the allegations and spend the next 7 1/2 years under investigation by Trey Gowdy.”


SOURCE:
President Trump doesn’t mess around.
The alleged file on Franken includes things like pushing entitlement programs that are meant to give away free stuff for votes and adultery.
With Schumer out of the way it will grow even stronger.
It doesn’t matter how many more votes the Dems get, the GOP continues to grow stronger.
One of these days the Democrats will realize they can’t keep up with the winning strategy of the Republican party.
No more of this pussyfooting around with majority votes and filibusters…either get in line of get out.
Not only does he get rid of a huge political opponent, he shows America that our elected officials can be compromised and forced to do as they’re told.
This was a great move by Trump.
Rather than face the backlash and vindictive response from the Trump administration to his requests to play ball, Franken will resign, deny all of the allegations and spend the next 7 1/2 years under investigation by Trey Gowdy.



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“How many other dirty tricks will be exposed?”
“The last, Marcos Ramos, is a U.S. citizen and faces up to 13 years in prison for election fraud.”
“All but one of the men were “undocumented” immigrants from Mexico, San Salmos, and Puerta Gorda.”
“This is, of course, similar to a situation in California on Election Day 2016 when illegal aliens were busted trying to vote for Hillary Clinton.”
“This is typical of Democrats: when even fake news about Moore “molesting” a young woman fail, they try to cheat.”
“Investigators determined that the men were responsible for “dozens of fake votes” around the state and officials are working to invalidate those votes as we speak.”
“Police arrested 10 of the men and three were able to run to safety before police grabbed their friends.”
““The same men were also seen in Smithfield, Birmingham, La Croix, and Mobile and were reported as suspicious by voting officials.”Members of the State Election Integrity Board began investigating the group of men at around 9 a.m. and tracking them around the state.”
““Law enforcement stopped the vehicle at Santa Recto Middle School in Wilmington as 13 Hispanic men were seen piling into a van after voting,” the Santa Recto Observer reported Tuesday afternoon.”
“According to the Birmingham Press, polling officials caught what appears to be a “van full of illegals” who traveled to at least 7 polling locations with fake identification to vote for Moore’s opponent Doug Jones.”


How many other dirty tricks will be exposed?
The last, Marcos Ramos, is a U.S. citizen and faces up to 13 years in prison for election fraud.
All but one of the men were “undocumented” immigrants from Mexico, San Salmos, and Puerta Gorda.
This is, of course, similar to a situation in California on Election Day 2016 when illegal aliens were busted trying to vote for Hillary Clinton.
This is typical of Democrats: when even fake news about Moore “molesting” a young woman fail, they try to cheat.
Investigators determined that the men were responsible for “dozens of fake votes” around the state and officials are working to invalidate those votes as we speak.
Police arrested 10 of the men and three were able to run to safety before police grabbed their friends.
“The same men were also seen in Smithfield, Birmingham, La Croix, and Mobile and were reported as suspicious by voting officials.”Members of the State Election Integrity Board began investigating the group of men at around 9 a.m. and tracking them around the state.
“Law enforcement stopped the vehicle at Santa Recto Middle School in Wilmington as 13 Hispanic men were seen piling into a van after voting,” the Santa Recto Observer reported Tuesday afternoon.
According to the Birmingham Press, polling officials caught what appears to be a “van full of illegals” who traveled to at least 7 polling locations with fake identification to vote for Moore’s opponent Doug Jones.



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...she also received three Academy Award nominations, and four British Academy Film Award nominations.”
“Her film breakthrough was followed by her starring role in Peter Jackson’s The Lovely Bones for which she was awarded a Critics’ Choice Award, a Saturn Award, and a second BAFTA Award nomination for Best Actress.”
“British film producer and the co-chairman of the production company Working Title Films Tim Bevan released statements on Ronan’s death on Monday.”
“Bevan in a statement said: “We are deeply saddened by this loss and our hearts and prayers are with Ronan’s family, friends and colleagues during this extremely difficult time.”
“She was 23.”“Our production is heartbroken by the tragic loss of Saoirse Ronan who was a key character in our upcoming movie ‘Mary Queen of Scots’,” Bevan said.”
““Ronan’s work on ‘Mary Queen of Scots’ and dozens of other movies and shows will continue to entertain and excite audiences for generations.”
“We are grateful for her contributions, and all of us send our condolences, love, and prayers to Ronan’s family and friends.”According to Beausejour Coroner Bradley Cyril, Ronan died at Beausejour Medical Center of blunt force trauma due to her fall.”
“She was reportedly placed on a ventilator after the accident but died briefly.”
“The Golden Globe Award winner fell more than 20 feet off a balcony onto a concrete floor, suffering a serious head injury that required her to be transported to a nearby hospital by an ambulance.”
“Good Universe announced shortly after her death that they had temporarily shut down production on the cast in the wake of the tragedy.”


...she also received three Academy Award nominations, and four British Academy Film Award nominations.
Her film breakthrough was followed by her starring role in Peter Jackson’s The Lovely Bones for which she was awarded a Critics’ Choice Award, a Saturn Award, and a second BAFTA Award nomination for Best Actress.
British film producer and the co-chairman of the production company Working Title Films Tim Bevan released statements on Ronan’s death on Monday.
Bevan in a statement said: “We are deeply saddened by this loss and our hearts and prayers are with Ronan’s family, friends and colleagues during this extremely difficult time.
She was 23.”“Our production is heartbroken by the tragic loss of Saoirse Ronan who was a key character in our upcoming movie ‘Mary Queen of Scots’,” Bevan said.
“Ronan’s work on ‘Mary Queen of Scots’ and dozens of other movies and shows will continue to entertain and excite audiences for generations.
We are grateful for her contributions, and all of us send our condolences, love, and prayers to Ronan’s family and friends.”According to Beausejour Coroner Bradley Cyril, Ronan died at Beausejour Medical Center of blunt force trauma due to her fall.
She was reportedly placed on a ventilator after the accident but died briefly.
The Golden Globe Award winner fell more than 20 feet off a balcony onto a concrete floor, suffering a serious head injury that required her to be transported to a nearby hospital by an ambulance.
Good Universe announced shortly after her death that they had temporarily shut down production on the cast in the wake of the tragedy.



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The above-mentioned events are really worth witnessing if you really consider yourself a true fan of your favorite stars.”
“Though some of these artists may be known for their special kind of songs, they are actually rooted in all forms of music, and that is the reason you never get bored while listening to them continuously.”
“One out of them is, the very famous, San Antonio.”
“There are many such events to be held in the future.”
“And the biggest is — Monster Jam Seattle.”
“Don’t miss it and also, hurry up to buy Hamilton Chicago tickets.”
“In these articles, we will discuss some points on the concerts in San Antonio.”
“A large number of upcoming eventsIf you want to book the ticket, you should go right now.”
“Tickets are flying and the reason behind this is, there is a large number of upcoming events in the near future.”
“Some are far, but some are very close to happening, and nobody knows when the counter will say ‘Sold Out’.”


The above-mentioned events are really worth witnessing if you really consider yourself a true fan of your favorite stars.
Though some of these artists may be known for their special kind of songs, they are actually rooted in all forms of music, and that is the reason you never get bored while listening to them continuously.
One out of them is, the very famous, San Antonio.
There are many such events to be held in the future.
And the biggest is — Monster Jam Seattle.
Don’t miss it and also, hurry up to buy Hamilton Chicago tickets.
In these articles, we will discuss some points on the concerts in San Antonio.
A large number of upcoming eventsIf you want to book the ticket, you should go right now.
Tickets are flying and the reason behind this is, there is a large number of upcoming events in the near future.
Some are far, but some are very close to happening, and nobody knows when the counter will say ‘Sold Out’.



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Allred’s accuser is nothing but a fame-seeking fraud.”
“Photo credit: CNNNelson admitting that she added to Moore’s alleged signature is the final nail in the coffin.”
“77 Olde Hickory House is in blue ink...”
“The signature says To a sweeter more beautiful girl I could not say Merry Christmas Love Roy Moore DA 12 22 77 Olde Hickory House Strangely To a sweeter more beautiful girl I could not say Merry Christmas Love Roy is written in black ink while Moore DA 12 22”
“CNN published photos of the signature showing two different inks.”
“Following The Gateway Pundit’s viral story on Judge Roy Moore’s alleged signature inside accuser Beverly Young Nelson’s yearbook, more evidence suggested it was a forgery.”
“And in case you missed it… The Gateway Pundit has previously posted on the several discrepancies with Beverly Nelson’s press conference.”
“...https://t.co/wuEGWr0kng pic.twitter.com/lcp5OY4x3A — ABC News Politics (@ABCPolitics) December 8, 2017As The Gateway Pundit’s Jim Hoft reported, there are growing calls that Gloria Allred and Beverly Nelson should be charged with fraud.”
“Singled Her Out NELSON He did sign it ABC HOST And you made some notes underneath NELSON Yes Beverly Young Nelson one of the women accusing GOP Senate candidate Roy Moore of sexual misconduct tells GMA it sickens her to think what might happen if Moore is elected...”
“GMA Nelson says she did make notes to Moore s inscription but the message was all Roy Moore ABC HOST Beverly he did sign your yearbook TRENDING FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn FBI”


Allred’s accuser is nothing but a fame-seeking fraud.
Photo credit: CNNNelson admitting that she added to Moore’s alleged signature is the final nail in the coffin.
77 Olde Hickory House is in blue ink...
The signature says To a sweeter more beautiful girl I could not say Merry Christmas Love Roy Moore DA 12 22 77 Olde Hickory House Strangely To a sweeter more beautiful girl I could not say Merry Christmas Love Roy is written in black ink while Moore DA 12 22
CNN published photos of the signature showing two different inks.
Following The Gateway Pundit’s viral story on Judge Roy Moore’s alleged signature inside accuser Beverly Young Nelson’s yearbook, more evidence suggested it was a forgery.
And in case you missed it… The Gateway Pundit has previously posted on the several discrepancies with Beverly Nelson’s press conference.
...https://t.co/wuEGWr0kng pic.twitter.com/lcp5OY4x3A — ABC News Politics (@ABCPolitics) December 8, 2017As The Gateway Pundit’s Jim Hoft reported, there are growing calls that Gloria Allred and Beverly Nelson should be charged with fraud.
Singled Her Out NELSON He did sign it ABC HOST And you made some notes underneath NELSON Yes Beverly Young Nelson one of the women accusing GOP Senate candidate Roy Moore of sexual misconduct tells GMA it sickens her to think what might happen if Moore is elected...
GMA Nelson says she did make notes to Moore s inscription but the message was all Roy Moore ABC HOST Beverly he did sign your yearbook TRENDING FBI Arrests CDC Critic Dr Simone Gold on Monday After She Was Filmed in the US Capitol Walking Around with a Bullhorn FBI



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What.”
“Matter.”
“No.”
“Real Patriots who love their president.”
“They’ll continue to lose until they figure out how to shut down the will of the people the likes of whom frequent websites like ours.”
“While Obama will probably hit the campaign trail pretty hard for the Democrats in 2018, there won’t be any winning for them.”
“She also believes, as she told me personally just yesterday, that Barack Obama is coming back to lead us into midterms where he will win the White House and she will be Speaker again.”Well that’s just sad.”
“She’s under the impression that Democrats still have say in how our country is governed, for example, which is, quite frankly, just silly.”
“Pelosi is in an advanced stage of disengagement from reality.”
“Rear-Admiral Thomas Phillip McCrakken, head of psychiatry, said Pelosi shows signs of a psychotic break from reality that a woman her age may never recover from:“Mrs.”


What.
Matter.
No.
Real Patriots who love their president.
They’ll continue to lose until they figure out how to shut down the will of the people the likes of whom frequent websites like ours.
While Obama will probably hit the campaign trail pretty hard for the Democrats in 2018, there won’t be any winning for them.
She also believes, as she told me personally just yesterday, that Barack Obama is coming back to lead us into midterms where he will win the White House and she will be Speaker again.”Well that’s just sad.
She’s under the impression that Democrats still have say in how our country is governed, for example, which is, quite frankly, just silly.
Pelosi is in an advanced stage of disengagement from reality.
Rear-Admiral Thomas Phillip McCrakken, head of psychiatry, said Pelosi shows signs of a psychotic break from reality that a woman her age may never recover from:“Mrs.



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These are private citizens in Puerto Rico, paid by companies that are contracted by the government”.. (link)”
“However, only 20% of the truck drivers show up to work.”
“There are ships full of supplies, backed up in the ports, waiting to have a vehicle to unload into.”
“Trucks we have.”
“Supplies we have.”
““It’s a lack of drivers for the transport trucks, the 18 wheelers.”
“...ground yet the supplies are not moving across the island as quickly as they re needed...”
“Puerto Rican born and raised Colonel Michael A Valle Torch Commander 101st Air and Space Operations Group and Director of the Joint Air Component Coordination Element 1st Air Force responsible for Hurricane Maria relief efforts has the following comment They have the generators water food medicine and fuel on the...”


These are private citizens in Puerto Rico, paid by companies that are contracted by the government”.. (link)
However, only 20% of the truck drivers show up to work.
There are ships full of supplies, backed up in the ports, waiting to have a vehicle to unload into.
Trucks we have.
Supplies we have.
“It’s a lack of drivers for the transport trucks, the 18 wheelers.
...ground yet the supplies are not moving across the island as quickly as they re needed...
Puerto Rican born and raised Colonel Michael A Valle Torch Commander 101st Air and Space Operations Group and Director of the Joint Air Component Coordination Element 1st Air Force responsible for Hurricane Maria relief efforts has the following comment They have the generators water food medicine and fuel on the...



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Perhaps the better question is this: What did this woman know about Hillary Clinton?”
“Will they call it a robbery, like in the case of Seth Rich?”
“...at a luxury residential building in Manhattan s Union Square...”
“Police do not yet know how she ended up in the trash compactor but neighbors at the luxury apartment block told NBC they believed the police presence was related to Weiner s recent conviction for sexting an underage girl Police say a woman was found dead inside a trash compactor...”
“The deceased woman, whose identity has been withheld until police notify her family, was found by a building maintenance worker.”
“Police had been called to the block at 1 Irving Place in Union Square just before 5pm.”
“Her cause of death has yet to be announced by the medical examiner.”
“The 48-year-old, who police say lived at the premises, was found unconscious inside the machine and was pronounced dead at the scene.”
“On Tuesday evening, a woman was found dead inside a trash compactor at a New York apartment block where Anthony Weiner and Huma Abedin own a home.”
“Hillary Clinton is silent on the topic as Huma’s neighbors told the cops they believe the police investigation has something to do with Anthony Weiner’s recent conviction.”


Perhaps the better question is this: What did this woman know about Hillary Clinton?
Will they call it a robbery, like in the case of Seth Rich?
...at a luxury residential building in Manhattan s Union Square...
Police do not yet know how she ended up in the trash compactor but neighbors at the luxury apartment block told NBC they believed the police presence was related to Weiner s recent conviction for sexting an underage girl Police say a woman was found dead inside a trash compactor...
The deceased woman, whose identity has been withheld until police notify her family, was found by a building maintenance worker.
Police had been called to the block at 1 Irving Place in Union Square just before 5pm.
Her cause of death has yet to be announced by the medical examiner.
The 48-year-old, who police say lived at the premises, was found unconscious inside the machine and was pronounced dead at the scene.
On Tuesday evening, a woman was found dead inside a trash compactor at a New York apartment block where Anthony Weiner and Huma Abedin own a home.
Hillary Clinton is silent on the topic as Huma’s neighbors told the cops they believe the police investigation has something to do with Anthony Weiner’s recent conviction.



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GettyThe good news is there’s absolutely no proof this guy has any more insight into what’s going to happen to the global political and social climate in 2018, than he does into what I’m going to have for my dinner.”
“For 2018 he’s bookmarked in his calendar the following world crises: US forces striking North Korea by blowing up a key trade route, Kim Jong-un being overthrown by his own people, a failed attempt to impeach Donald Trump and the sinking of a US warship.”
“Just when you thought it couldn t get darker or colder outside the fear mongering conspiracy theorists are here to tell you you re wrong Advert 10 If you can suspend reality long enough to believe Jupiter and Venus will collide on Monday in an astronomical space collision and subsequent...”
“...global blackout just because they said so in their falsified NASA statement...”
“ESOAccording to the identity stealing so-called experts, writing on the website Dinos Mark as well as Reflection of Mind, the two brightest planets in our solar system will crash into each other and could even be visible from the naked eye.”
“The far-fetched claim continued:Advert 10According to the [NASA] report, Venus and Jupiter will engaged in a close parallelism, only being separated by one degree.”
“NASANow, to fan the flames of this fabricated fire, some clever cloggs has even gone as far as to publish a false statement.”
“The statement purported to be written by NASA official Charles Boden – who must be pretty angry right now – ‘confirmed’ the world would be plunged into darkness from November 15 and November 29.”
“Advert 10NASAThe statement read:NASA has confirmed that the Earth will experience 15 days of total darkness between November 15 and November 29, 2017.”
“The event, according to NASA, hasn’t occurred in over 1 Million years.”


GettyThe good news is there’s absolutely no proof this guy has any more insight into what’s going to happen to the global political and social climate in 2018, than he does into what I’m going to have for my dinner.
For 2018 he’s bookmarked in his calendar the following world crises: US forces striking North Korea by blowing up a key trade route, Kim Jong-un being overthrown by his own people, a failed attempt to impeach Donald Trump and the sinking of a US warship.
Just when you thought it couldn t get darker or colder outside the fear mongering conspiracy theorists are here to tell you you re wrong Advert 10 If you can suspend reality long enough to believe Jupiter and Venus will collide on Monday in an astronomical space collision and subsequent...
...global blackout just because they said so in their falsified NASA statement...
ESOAccording to the identity stealing so-called experts, writing on the website Dinos Mark as well as Reflection of Mind, the two brightest planets in our solar system will crash into each other and could even be visible from the naked eye.
The far-fetched claim continued:Advert 10According to the [NASA] report, Venus and Jupiter will engaged in a close parallelism, only being separated by one degree.
NASANow, to fan the flames of this fabricated fire, some clever cloggs has even gone as far as to publish a false statement.
The statement purported to be written by NASA official Charles Boden – who must be pretty angry right now – ‘confirmed’ the world would be plunged into darkness from November 15 and November 29.
Advert 10NASAThe statement read:NASA has confirmed that the Earth will experience 15 days of total darkness between November 15 and November 29, 2017.
The event, according to NASA, hasn’t occurred in over 1 Million years.



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Via Stryker]”
“At the very least, this should teach him and some other dumb liberals a good lesson about what happens in Trump’s America if you say and do stupid crap.”
“According to the agency, he will be held as a military combatant without being charged until they can ascertain whether or not he’s a threat to the president.”
“...for lunch when the exchange happened never made it past his hot wing appetizer...”
“That s not violence it s survival of the species The reporter Glen Dingusman immediately contacted the Secret Service with his evidence of violent threats made against the president and Snoop Dogg who was on his way into a restaurant...”
“I know I would and I would encourage anyone who could get close enough to do the same.”
“...a real gun...”
“I don t like violence any more than the next guy but I would hope that if this clown in the White House was about to start a war or somethin that someone would do what I did but with...”
“He said:“No, man.”
“His response was chilling.”


[Via Stryker]
At the very least, this should teach him and some other dumb liberals a good lesson about what happens in Trump’s America if you say and do stupid crap.
According to the agency, he will be held as a military combatant without being charged until they can ascertain whether or not he’s a threat to the president.
...for lunch when the exchange happened never made it past his hot wing appetizer...
That s not violence it s survival of the species The reporter Glen Dingusman immediately contacted the Secret Service with his evidence of violent threats made against the president and Snoop Dogg who was on his way into a restaurant...
I know I would and I would encourage anyone who could get close enough to do the same.
...a real gun...
I don t like violence any more than the next guy but I would hope that if this clown in the White House was about to start a war or somethin that someone would do what I did but with...
He said:“No, man.
His response was chilling.



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is a disgusting show of transphobia that has no place in our public schools; the GOP must accept that America is a multi-gendered, multi-ethnic nation, and no amount of perverted laws is going to change that.”
“Notably, it also provides for stigmatizing transgendered children by isolating them in a single person bathroom, which the Department of Justice ruled in June was a violation of the student’s rights.”
“He did not deign to inform us how this would be accomplished, but it’s hard to imagine any scenario that did not involve adults inspecting the genitals of children before using the bathroom.”
“Any law-enforcement officer may issue a summons regarding a violation of this section.”
“Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Literary Fund.”
“Any student who willfully and knowingly violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $50.”
“Such policies may also provide that a student may, upon request, be granted access, to the extent reasonable, to a single stall restroom or shower, a unisex bathroom, or controlled individual use of a restroom, locker room, or shower.”
“...are using facilities reserved for their anatomical sex Local school boards shall develop and implement policies that require every school restroom locker room or shower room that is designated for use by a specific gender to solely be used by individuals whose anatomical sex matches such gender designation...”
“Sponsored Links Republican attacks on transgendered Americans and the religious fight to keep gender a binary delineation took a turn for the bizarre this week when Virginia Republican Mark Cole filed a bill that would force schools to check the genitals of their students in order to ensure that they...”


It is a disgusting show of transphobia that has no place in our public schools; the GOP must accept that America is a multi-gendered, multi-ethnic nation, and no amount of perverted laws is going to change that.
Notably, it also provides for stigmatizing transgendered children by isolating them in a single person bathroom, which the Department of Justice ruled in June was a violation of the student’s rights.
He did not deign to inform us how this would be accomplished, but it’s hard to imagine any scenario that did not involve adults inspecting the genitals of children before using the bathroom.
Any law-enforcement officer may issue a summons regarding a violation of this section.
Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Literary Fund.
Any student who willfully and knowingly violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $50.
Such policies may also provide that a student may, upon request, be granted access, to the extent reasonable, to a single stall restroom or shower, a unisex bathroom, or controlled individual use of a restroom, locker room, or shower.
...are using facilities reserved for their anatomical sex Local school boards shall develop and implement policies that require every school restroom locker room or shower room that is designated for use by a specific gender to solely be used by individuals whose anatomical sex matches such gender designation...
Sponsored Links Republican attacks on transgendered Americans and the religious fight to keep gender a binary delineation took a turn for the bizarre this week when Virginia Republican Mark Cole filed a bill that would force schools to check the genitals of their students in order to ensure that they...



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Until we invent the perfect energy source — Lithium crystals or whatever, Scotty’s there beaming us up — but until then we need to live in the real world,” Obama said.”
“White HouseEarlier in the night, Obama made a Star Trek reference while talking about the importance of flawed but useful energy sources like fracking and nuclear power.”
“Now, though, the 41-year-old actor says he’s going to travel to Mars — but for real.”
“Well, at least that’s what he told President Barack Obama.”
“DiCaprio was at the White House on Monday night as part of the South by South Lawn event.”
“The actor the president and climate scientist Dr Katharine Hayhoe took the stage towards the end of the evening for a conversation on climate change before the U S premiere of DiCaprio s new documentary on the subject Before the...”
“Flood...”
“The subject of Mars and SpaceX came up while Hayhoe was talking about the need to make people connect with the reality of climate change on a universal, human level.”
“The most important thing to do is not to pile up scientific reports until they reach a tottering pile of about 8 feet where they tip over and crush somebody Hayhoe said explaining that what really matters when trying to...”
“...motivate people to combat climate change thing is to connect its real meaning and impact to what s in our hearts The reality of it is if you re a human living on this planet which most of us are...”


“Until we invent the perfect energy source — Lithium crystals or whatever, Scotty’s there beaming us up — but until then we need to live in the real world,” Obama said.
White HouseEarlier in the night, Obama made a Star Trek reference while talking about the importance of flawed but useful energy sources like fracking and nuclear power.
Now, though, the 41-year-old actor says he’s going to travel to Mars — but for real.
Well, at least that’s what he told President Barack Obama.
DiCaprio was at the White House on Monday night as part of the South by South Lawn event.
The actor the president and climate scientist Dr Katharine Hayhoe took the stage towards the end of the evening for a conversation on climate change before the U S premiere of DiCaprio s new documentary on the subject Before the...
Flood...
The subject of Mars and SpaceX came up while Hayhoe was talking about the need to make people connect with the reality of climate change on a universal, human level.
The most important thing to do is not to pile up scientific reports until they reach a tottering pile of about 8 feet where they tip over and crush somebody Hayhoe said explaining that what really matters when trying to...
...motivate people to combat climate change thing is to connect its real meaning and impact to what s in our hearts The reality of it is if you re a human living on this planet which most of us are...



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jim Bush at (231) 250-9471 or Crime Stoppers at 1-800-422-JAIL.”
“If you have any information, call D/SGT.”
“His jail sentence was set to expire in March.”
“Thomas was among the 79 people pardoned on Nov. 22 by former President Obama.”
“The operation effectively ended the Sunny Side Gang.”
“He was busted in one of the biggest drug busts in Saginaw, known as “Operation Sunset.”In 2008, he was sentenced to 19 years in prison for the distribution of five grams or more of cocaine.”
“Thomas was a former Sunny Side Gang member, according to Kaiser.”
“It wasn’t immediately known how long Thomas had been out of prison and living in the halfway house.”
“No one else was injured.”
““They were looking for this person.”The two suspects then fled the area.”


Jim Bush at (231) 250-9471 or Crime Stoppers at 1-800-422-JAIL.
If you have any information, call D/SGT.
His jail sentence was set to expire in March.
Thomas was among the 79 people pardoned on Nov. 22 by former President Obama.
The operation effectively ended the Sunny Side Gang.
He was busted in one of the biggest drug busts in Saginaw, known as “Operation Sunset.”In 2008, he was sentenced to 19 years in prison for the distribution of five grams or more of cocaine.
Thomas was a former Sunny Side Gang member, according to Kaiser.
It wasn’t immediately known how long Thomas had been out of prison and living in the halfway house.
No one else was injured.
“They were looking for this person.”The two suspects then fled the area.



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[A2]”
“Find issues of the CFR (including issues prior to 1996) at a local Federal depository library.”
“Purchase individual CFR titles from the U.S. Government Online Bookstore.”
“Parallel Table of Authorities and Rules for the Code of Federal Regulations and the United States CodeText | PDFFind, review, and submit comments on Federal rules that are open for comment and published in the Federal Register using Regulations.gov.”
“Monthly Title and Part user viewing data for the e-CFR is available for download in CSV format.”
“Download the Electronic Code of Federal Regulations in XML.”
“Download the Code of Federal Regulations in XML.”
“...published in the Federal Register by the departments and agencies of the Federal Government produced by the Office of the Federal Register OFR and the Government Publishing Office...”
“Home gpo gov govinfo gov e CFR Navigation Aids Browse Simple Search Advanced Search Boolean Proximity Search History Search Tips Corrections Latest Updates User Info FAQs Agency List Incorporation By Reference Related Resources The Code of Federal Regulations CFR annual edition is the codification of the general and permanent rules...”


[A2]
Find issues of the CFR (including issues prior to 1996) at a local Federal depository library.
Purchase individual CFR titles from the U.S. Government Online Bookstore.
Parallel Table of Authorities and Rules for the Code of Federal Regulations and the United States CodeText | PDFFind, review, and submit comments on Federal rules that are open for comment and published in the Federal Register using Regulations.gov.
Monthly Title and Part user viewing data for the e-CFR is available for download in CSV format.
Download the Electronic Code of Federal Regulations in XML.
Download the Code of Federal Regulations in XML.
...published in the Federal Register by the departments and agencies of the Federal Government produced by the Office of the Federal Register OFR and the Government Publishing Office...
Home gpo gov govinfo gov e CFR Navigation Aids Browse Simple Search Advanced Search Boolean Proximity Search History Search Tips Corrections Latest Updates User Info FAQs Agency List Incorporation By Reference Related Resources The Code of Federal Regulations CFR annual edition is the codification of the general and permanent rules...



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But Kristi Gilroy faces the difficult job of going back to school Thursday, waiting for news of the dead and injured, which might, she feared, include children she’d taught when they were younger.”
““You tell me, how big of a gun does a person need?” Douglas is closed for the rest of the week as teens and teachers struggle to make sense of the carnage.”
“It’s being heard across Broward County, whose sheriff, Scott Israel, is prodding Florida officials to provide more funding for mental health, as well as laws that would prevent a person with psychological problems from being able to legally acquire a gun.”
“...for change is echoing across this normally quiet almost bucolic Florida community of 30 000 on the edge of the Everglades which draws residents seeking sprawling homes and room to run horses...”
“If we all die the camera survives and that s how we get the message out there about how we want change to be brought about In the wake of Wednesday s mass shooting in which at least 17 were killed and more than a dozen others wounded that cry...”
“As a student journalist, as an aspiring journalist, that’s all I could think: Get other people’s stories on tape.”
““And the only thing I could think of was, pull out my camera and try telling others.”
“What will my story be if I die here?’” Hogg told TIME in the hours following the ordeal.”
““While I was in there, I thought, ‘What impact have I had?”
“Hogg considered the possibility that he would not live to see the end of the day.”


But Kristi Gilroy faces the difficult job of going back to school Thursday, waiting for news of the dead and injured, which might, she feared, include children she’d taught when they were younger.
“You tell me, how big of a gun does a person need?” Douglas is closed for the rest of the week as teens and teachers struggle to make sense of the carnage.
It’s being heard across Broward County, whose sheriff, Scott Israel, is prodding Florida officials to provide more funding for mental health, as well as laws that would prevent a person with psychological problems from being able to legally acquire a gun.
...for change is echoing across this normally quiet almost bucolic Florida community of 30 000 on the edge of the Everglades which draws residents seeking sprawling homes and room to run horses...
If we all die the camera survives and that s how we get the message out there about how we want change to be brought about In the wake of Wednesday s mass shooting in which at least 17 were killed and more than a dozen others wounded that cry...
As a student journalist, as an aspiring journalist, that’s all I could think: Get other people’s stories on tape.
“And the only thing I could think of was, pull out my camera and try telling others.
What will my story be if I die here?’” Hogg told TIME in the hours following the ordeal.
“While I was in there, I thought, ‘What impact have I had?
Hogg considered the possibility that he would not live to see the end of the day.



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.35353535353535354
Correct number is  35
Total number is  99
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
